 The other thing I love is people who leave when the government says "let's bring the budget back in the black by 2014". That's considered bad.   He should go to Alberta.
Joy Division - [Atmosphere](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ZNoUi0mpBOc)
How would natal work with an FPS?  Would I have to "register" an empty roll of wrapping paper so I have something to hold on to or do I just make a gun with my hand?
eztv is the best place, other torrent sites usually get theirs from eztv.  http://twitter.com/EZTV_IT
If you think there is a chance you'll get raped in church in front of your mom, take a self defense class or carry a can of mace for fuck's sake.
[Strangely prescient.](http://www.losanjealous.com/nfc/perm.php?c=144&amp;q=160)
"The Game" anyone? This is real and a lot of it IS creepy. But NLP and hypnosis is a powerful way of communicating and has broken down a lot of the traditional myths surrounding hypnosis. Unfortunately one of the founders [Richard Bandler](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=s941m7CKft4) (among others) lays it on pretty thick in terms of his own stories. Yet, there's some truth in it. 
For the record, if you approach a woman and it's obvious that you're "coming out of your hole," she's going to find that exceedingly creepy. She's going to wonder why it is you were in a hole in the first place, and why you can't seem to be social and maintain positive relationships.
Yup
Then they are wrong.  It IS warming.  There could perhaps be debate about the causes and the potential effects, but that it HAS been warming has been observed.
(1.awesome mash up artists) - super mash bros -girl talk (2.pretty rad electronic-ish bands) - ratatatat -Röyksopp -Neon Neon -Neon indian  (4.some more harder stuff. uh i enjoy them a lot.) -four year strong -set your goals  that should be a nice variety.
I learned this on QI today! What a coincidence!
100 percent of Windows 7 flaws fixed by installing Linux.
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Charged_black_hole
If I had to choose simply one, it would easily be LSD. But the best thing ever is a good candyflip, mellowed out at the ending with some sweet herb. You get the mind expansion of LSD, the euphoric empathy and sociability of MDMA framed in by the general pleasantness of smoking a good joint/bowl. Should not be done too often. Edit: seems I forgot the _why_.. Alright, I enjoy LSD because it's enlightening, you never know what you're gonna experience and it always exposes something from your inner life that always has been there but you never noticed. MDMA is the ultimate social experience, I simply end up being a much more nice person, and my social shyness dissipates. Together they amplify each other. Herb needs no more explanation, as said in other threads, it enhances everything. 
It was a bad few months. It started with the flu, then an ear infection, then appendicitis. And my 3rd night in the hospital I passed out, fell flat on my face and broke my nose.   Luckily, I was able to get Medical EI so I wasn't totally broke at the end of it all. The whole story is long and kinda boring.   I hope you heal fast my friend. 
Absurd.  I love it :)
Cool.  Interesting dead heat between IE and Safari.
Pasta.
Cunt?
&gt;Oh my gosh, I can feel the definition already!  Two seconds after you did ten seconds of "exercise." Right.
or he's in Australia and trying for an April Fools of his own.   That's a pretty UK-o-centric username he's got there though.
Please explain...  I'm reading about color space now, adobeRGB and sRGB, .icc profiles and all that, and the formula seems to be to keep it all in the same profile. Which would be sRGB in most cases.
His cover of Dylan's "Satisfied Mind" is amazing as well.
Here's my referral url:  https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTMyOTY5
[THIS](http://www.legorobotcomics.com/?id=22)
Is this going to be broadcast?
hahaha,so funny
I'm sure this suits the Israelis just fine.
It did change it's look. Then it went down again.  Guess it's coffee time.
Ahh that sounds exactly like what I'm thinking, thanks!   I just had a little discussion with a math friend of mine and I asked him about a line... I asked if there are only 2 neighboring points for any point on a line... to me that makes obvious sense, there can only be 1 point to the left and 1 point to the right of any point on the X axis...   Then extrapolating that concept into 2D it gets weird because, doesn't that mean there would be only 4 directly neighboring points to any one point?   This stuff is so simple but its blowing my mind :)
But you can roll over stuff better!
GASP.  Alert the media, we can't allow this to continue.
NOW WHERE IS MY DAMNED KOSHER COCA-COLA?!?!  I've looked everywhere and I can't find it :(
Meme over. Everyone go home.
Do you mean Rocky?
I think you need to grow up.  One issue the states are handling, slowly, thru reduction of criminal penalties, MM, and other methods is not worth a the presidency.  George W Bush was president a year and a half ago.  This country RE-ELECTED George W Bush 5 years ago.  5. 
Archie is going to be a big loss for next season
That song is definitely pretty hilarious. 
&gt; It is the basis of languages such as F# and Haskell.  Also: SML, Caml, OCaml, and Scala. C# and C++ also likely owe their local type inference to him.
What if the guy was hideous?
...resisting the urge to say so much...
I'm pretty sure the song you're referring to is Krib.  I'd link to it, but youtube seems to be down.
I had weekly chores when I was growing up.. during the week my job was to go to school and do my homework, and clean up after dinner, saturday morning I did all my chores - a lot of what that kid is doing on his list. If I did all my chores to my parents' standards, then I would recieve my allowance.   Reflecting on the approach my parents took, I learned a lot of valuable lessons on the value of money, and how hard my parents worked to keep everything together with 3 kids. Conversely, my husband never had to do chores and admits that he was very spoiled.. it also took me a while to "train" him, and I dont think he was as aware of how hard we had to work just to pay the bills.   I don't think that kid is spoiled at all.. I'm a little jealous that he got more than I did growing up, but oh well. I think it's an example of fantastic parenting.
By that logic we would be able to kill anyone who was unconscious, whether they're just knocked out or in a coma.
I like it. It's cleaner than before, and it puts the video right in the middle of the page, where I want it to be.
Full disclosure: I work for the company that makes these.
Obligatory [XKCD](http://xkcd.com/242/)
Frozen pizzas are like $3.
&gt;I'm going overboard on creepy I think. &gt;_&gt;  I'm going to hedge on the idea that she's encountered creepy on a level none of us will ever dream of. 
**Cannabis**  Everything else has too many side effects to enjoy the exalted status of the almighty herb.  A perfect balance of casual recreational life enhancement, and mental enlightenment.  The only negative side effect weed has on my life is a depleted bank account and a healthy distrust of law enforcement and the government.  LSD and Psilocybin are great but not something that I would want to do (or can do) with a great regularity.  I have gained much from my experiences, but they require too much mental and time commitment to enjoy with much frequency.  And it seems to be the laws of diminishing returns with their usage, the more you do them, the less significant the experiences become.  The same could be said for others like DMT and mescaline.  Stimulants (like coke,speed, and impure street ecstasy) are too addictive and make me jittery.  They can be fun in the right atmostphere, but not my favorites.  Alcohol is a great social drug, but the downsides (HANGOVERS!) are too severe.  herb doesn't give hangovers, it cures them!  Opiates are too destructive on my body, they tend to make me feel equally ill and high.  Not to mention the dangers of their dependence.
Damnit, was it a broken leg joke?  I was assuming it was because he can't play the other one.  
Many of 'em, many much moosen.
Its prequels, Dark Forces and Dark Forces II: Jedi Knight.
This has been SOP in the *nix world for years now; everybody knows you don't do everything as root!
Is that excess plastic there for a reason? or is the metallic bit all that matters?
Gender recruitment sucks. :-(
What does this yahoo post have to do with racism, sexual frustration or the religious right?  You better do some introspection before judging people.
When I found out my girlfriend was pregnant I canceled band practice...for ever.   I gave up a lot of my social life, and my passion. One time during breakfast my son (then 2 yo) looked at me and said he hated me. My point being: there are a ton of very shitty moments and there are sacrifices that never occurred to me that I'd have to make. I wear a god damn suit and tie now! Once we were driving down the road and I pointed out a chipmunk by the side of the road. Just as he saw it, the fucking thing leaped in front of the car and I killed it. It was his intro to the facts of death.  However, there are magnificent moments and truly fulfilling moments that I wouldn't give any thing for. Just yesterday we went for haircuts together and he looked up and said, "dad we can't punch each other in the head because it'll ruin our haircuts" My trick was to realize that it can all be broken down into a child's stage of development and it's perfectly OK to say...this stage really fucking sux. and other stages are unbelievable.
I would so much rather have them precarious-looking and interesting!
You tricked me! I actually went and a had a look at these ghastly magazines.  Well, here is [US magazine](http://www.usmagazine.com/). And here is [People](http://www.people.com/people/). Lots of relationship stuff. No cheating women anywhere. You prove me wrong.  But the point is a different one anyways. We are not talking about some made up shit in a tabloid when it comes to Clinton, Spitzer, Edwards, Sanford, Letterman and Woods. We are talking about a large public outcry. When was the last time you heard that about an adulterous wife?
God damnit. See you on Friday reddit.
Yep, us dumb Americans.
Awww! :'-) 
Above us, only sky.
I believe you are looking for the "Let's play who has the best drivers license pic" thread.
I think the funniest part is when he shows the rest of the room - with all the holes in the wall.
reminds of me this http://www.framebox.de/creations/3d/salad/index.htm
I used to be very much in favor of 'realistic' depictions of Jesus in art, but I have come to think that paintings of black/white/east asian/etc Jesus reveal a very significant theological fact.  In Christian theology, the whole point of the Incarnation of the Second Person of the Trinity is the to facilitate the remediation of God and Man.  In other words, Christ became human to identify with humans.  The fact that he was human is far more important than what type of human he is, and I think that presenting pictures of him in a way that identifies him with the group most likely to see those pictures illustrates this theological fact quite nicely.
A Caninite?
i lol'd at: Jew Fag  sign.
Sorry, the offer expired. They only accepted the coupons up to midnight European time :(
Oh shit, I mustve totally missed that one. Thanks
Your attitude is unwanted in our nation of tolerance.
She showed some boob last episode. I retired to my bunk and watched that scene many times.
Hell I'd be so happy if I could troll well. I think I tried it once or twice in a comment with poor grammar, and I was thrilled with myself. 
Yoga
Hey me too!
I kinda hate to say it, but my first thought when I saw that setup, was "Holy shit, I hope someone makes that!" I don't even like scrabble.
You can try walking in a straight line, but eventually you'll slam into a wall.  
I had a hard time finding the right card for my close friends and family members, until got a card in the mail for my birthday from a ex babysitter.  I was excited to see that card had my picture on it and a personal message printed on the inside along with pictures of my kids.  I actually thought she had done it at walmart, so when I called her to thank her she told me she did it herself on www.sendoutcards.com/my_cards I just sent my first card for free through the site for my daughters birthday, so she could be just as surprised.  I would recommend this site for anyone who likes sending out card or if you just have a hard time finding the perfect one, just make your own and it will be sent by mail for you without even licking a stamp HOW EASY IS THAT!!!!!!
What bothers me though, is that if the Christian god existed, I would end up in hell with these rapists, just for not believing in the Christian god (among SO many others). 
The first article I ever wrote on my blog hit number one on the front page of Reddit. I was buzzed off a few beers when I submitted it literally seconds before going out for a night of heavy drinking. When I came home at 3 AM completely drunk as all hell and saw my article on the front page, I felt like the biggest superstar on the planet.
Starcraft 2, Episode 1... Part 1.
Are you left handed?  How do you hold the mouse?
Why not just drug regulations. De-crowd the prisons, raise state revenue. If someone wants to hurt them self let them hurt them self.
am i lost? i thought i was in /r/funny
I hope those of you that are down-voting this have at least heard more than the 1 or 2 songs that get played on the radio. Their other songs (especially from older albums) most likely don't sound like you think they do.
&gt;So how did they get these numbers?   Charity Navigator. 
5 hours? He wasn't even through the tutorial. He basically reviewed a demo. Good job.
stoked for porter meadow 420? 
Google needs to stop being tools, and quit wrenching with our sense of reality.
In the area where I live, somehow gangsta, white trash and goth culture all combined, at the least their fashion, into some very odd looking sleazy people.
Let me guess, then you took her on a geocaching date?
&gt;GOD HATES MAGS  I thought you were going to talk about something NSFW for a second there.
r/DoesAnybodyElse  r/DAE
Reminder: don't give her facials!
&gt;Personally, I can't do that anymore, since I realized that 85-90% of the people in this country are "the enemy," voting in statists who take away my freedoms and steal my money, so helping them out tastes like ashes in my mouth.  The government indoctrinates everyone, a few free thinkers are able to untangle most of the lies. The government steals, kidnaps, and kills people and a few are able to become very successful on their own terms. Most people just ride the coattails because that's what they were taught to do and it's not financially worth the effort to do anything else. The "people" are not your enemy, they are any libertarian's only hope for freedom. And any libertarian that is capable and enjoys helping people should do it because the thing standing in the way of freedom is the idea that "the government" must fix all the world's problems. Helping people helps them to understand the truth. If you turn your back on them, they turn to the government.
Wow, you're great at this. Leaps are questionable. As long as it's the smallest interval possible, it's fine. I think I changed most of the things you caught. I'm still working. EDIT: On the last i chord, I like the way you changed it, but by making the alto an E, I think the tone is more solid.
i love the peek-a-boo shot... number three!
&gt;insertive  Freudian slip?
isn't it &lt;b&gt; instead?
On the way home after work I was walking from the tube station when a homeless lady with a massive gut leapt out of the shadows of a dark alley way and asked me to explain what a word meant, pointing to a magazine ad about pregnancy. She stunk of booze and cigarettes and I could only think about how rancid she smelt, all up in my personal space, pointing to a pregnant lady.  I couldn't help wonder why she was asking me about this word hidden in the fineprint. My senses became overwhelmed and I started to stumble on the definition. My eyes blurred. The whiskey on her breath, the clothes stained with cigarettes showing way too much flesh on such a cold winters night. Then it hit me. The ad, the dark alley way, the loose fitted clothes, the alcohol.  The word she wanted me to clarify was conception, and she was trying to seduce (rape) me.
They should get 10,000 to every game. 30,000 to derbies. The Victory to still dominate. 
Star Wars is what's known as a film (or a series of films if you will). You see, it's a fiction, not an actual reflection of a real historical happening. So, there really isn't actually much more to the story than what you see in the film. 
worth reading if you use Accpac Payroll
It's not that we don't have empathy for others, just those who chose to attack on noted days of fast/repentance, and who put bombs in baby carriages and playgrounds, and who turn down perfectly good deals and blow the shit out of everything in something of a high-powered hissy fit every time we aren't pleased when they say they want to exterminate us.  oh and for the record someone tries pretty much every generation.
tl;dr I don't like the window buttons being put on the left by an opaque dictatorship, so I'm thinking of moving to OS X.  Never mind that OS X has the window buttons on the left and is hardly a democracy …
When I applied I got an automated response with a special code to use on their website, to take a 5 hour programming test. It was balls easy and I finished in about an hour (and then almost forgot to submit when I got distracted by dwarffortress, oops). A few days later they called and setup a phone interview, and then after that I had to *pay for myself* to fly out for an in-person interview. The interview was pretty much purely algorithmic (what's the big-O of this, of that, what's the big-O if we do this? etc), which I thought was kind of funny since their software tends to be among the slowest around as far MMO's go. Overall I give their interview process a C+.  Do they not do the automated programming test for web developers? I think that's a great screening method.
I love... leg
That's fine. Get the fuck out then.
Well, I've seen this one coming. Good thing I'm bored/done with WoW, and not terribly interested in either Diablo III or Starcraft 2 (a.k.a. same old shit). Rest of you: say hello to (not so)micro transactions galore, premature releases, and scorched earth brand exploitation.
&gt; "They're all comedians."  No, Letterman, Conan, and Kimmel are comedians.  Jay Leno is a douche. 
why did they focus so much time on the dude playing the djembe
If it is blood... your meat is probably still alive.
People with a lot of money are often willing to pay a major premium to have the "best." And bless their hearts, because they subsidize it for the rest of us.
Most redditors reside in the US. But good point.
My father emigrated from Saudi Arabia to the U.S. a few years before I was born.   Holy shit, thank you dad.  Background edit: I'm gay, and though I would likely not have been born in the alternate universe where my dad remained in Saudi Arabia, homosexuality is of course an offense against the kingdom, as are alcohol and all the other wonderful things that I like which aren't sodomy, including sodomy.  Background edit Edit: I am also a witch, with wooden balls that float.
Cool.  A couple places to start:   [Marlyand Financial Aid](http://www.mhec.state.md.us/financialaid/apply.asp)   You said you were a student, so this should be destination 1.  Financial aid often gives you more than enough to pay for classes (living expenses, in other words).  Also, have you filled out a FAFSA?  Loans are a bitch, but paying a bunch later is better than being homeless and dropping out of school.   [Maryland family Investment](http://www.peoples-law.org/income/gov-ben/family_investment_program.htm)   This could also be a help.  Basically MD's version of welfare.  No shame in taking assistance when you need it; you will be paying into this when you get a job.   [Maryland Foodstamps](http://www.dhr.state.md.us/fiaprograms/fstamp/index.php)   If it comes down to it, know what you need to do to keep eating.  Foodstamps aren't just for the homeless.  If you have a place to stay but you're spending every dime on rent, this might be the way you get a dinner.   [Maryland Unemployment Help](http://www.layoffsurvivalguide.com/unemployment-Maryland.html)   I haven't looked at this too closely, but it might have vital information for you.   The most important thing I can say is, don't give up.  True story: I had a friend in college who got kicked out of housing because the RAs wanted him to rat out a friend for using pot.  He himself had done nothing wrong, but because he wouldn't rat out his friend, he lost his right to housing.  He was part of a student group that had exclusive access to a student lounge on campus.  There were maybe 10 of them and faculty never checked up on them.  Everyone else banded together and cleaned out a storage closet in the lounge and he lived there for a year.  He bummed showers off of friends in various dorms.   The point is, keep an open mind.  A couple years of inadequate living situations will be worth it when you get your degree.  The job market is pretty close to rock bottom right now so its only going to get better.  You might make some concessions in your lifestyle you'd never have considered making before, but you'll make it.  
Would you kindly...
not witty, but i saw a conan one that said: "this is what I look like with a beard: ?:^(o)"
That just kinda rolls off the tongue doesn't it?
As an east indian male that lived in india and the middle east for the majority of my youth I kind of get where you are coming from... well not really... but I'm fairly buzzed and want to coment...  When I moved to North America I always stereotyped Indian girls as being very conservative and would thus not pay them the light of day. Almost all my gfs were white (couple asian - vietnamese mostly), which def didn't make the parents happy. I remember when they question why i didnt bring any indian girls over, I used to joke that I've come all the way to NA, I could have stayed out east if I wanted Indian girls. That and the enormous amounts of hair always bothered me... even if they don't look that hairy, believe me they are... its gross/  ewwie  However, last weekend I hooked up with an indian girl I met at the bar and she was wild. Would tell me what to do, wanted it doggy style, spitting on my cock like sasha gray. All in all, a great fucking time.   I'm kind of drunk here, but what I'm trying to say is, go fuck some indian girls and see for yourself, before you start stereo typing u jack ass!
Well, I'm a white male.  I was told they wouldn't have a problem with me.  Was that person being optimistic?  Hah.
&gt;Amazon is going to run a promotion on baby supplies like diapers, wipes, and formula. If we run an ad, we will get 10% of everything bought after clicking on the ad.  What are you going to do with a 10% supply of diapers and formula?
lol wut?  But seriously... lol wut?
Thanks. :) I like how you related your feelings of interaction with other men to the female/male interactions of caution. Upvoted.
Picked up a couple of 'roos on Highway 1 this morning, mate.
Leg or knee raises, but either hanging from a pull-up bar or holding at the top position of a chest dip station (parallel bars).  Also, you can do 'cable situps' as I call them, since crunch motions are today's evil. You attach a rope attachment to a high cable pulley, face away from the machine, kneel on the ground, and bend at the hips forward. (Keep spine neutral and focus on the abs, as the hip flexors can take over the movement if you are not careful)  Also, doing a lot of overhead work while standing (such as military press) will work the core to a great deal.
I am an asian man and I would protect you. And my axe!
Brilliant disguise; no one will notice that parakeet.
[Source.](http://www.etereaestudios.com/docs_html/nbyn_htm/about_index.htm)
Ok, well, how about you head over to r/gonewild and show that you 'still got it'?
This is the only answer.
&gt;How often do you catch us?  If there was a time when we didn't catch you, how would we know about it in order to come up with a ratio?  For what it's worth, I catch people pretty often. 
Hah hah. I have a bridge I built a while back. With recession and all, it's the best time to buy it. You should definitely come check it out.
Right, exactly.  I do think he was messing with foolsjourney to an extent but the rest of the thread seemed...normal.
What the fudge? Could someone offer some info on this? xD
Well Fraize also contacted me and is going to help me out.  For those of you that are interested int he product it is here: http://www.thinkgeek.com/geektoys/rc/c764/ For as small as it is it goes very fast.  They also have a flying hornet and warthog.
Yes, but Sheridan, died and on the third day he rose from the dead.
Thanks. That sounds like a decent program, even though I do wish it would get rid of the abstinence promotion. For some reason (if other people follow that link) the link goes to the homepage, not . . .=7425, you have to navigate there yourself.  BUT, that program and Title V seem different. I got to a CNN post about it (seemed less biased) and it had these things to say about qualifying for Title V:  &gt;Programs that receive this funding must "teach that abstinence from sexual activity is the only certain way to avoid out-of-wedlock pregnancy, sexually transmitted diseases, and other associated health problems," according to the Department of Health and Human Services. To qualify, they must also teach that sex before marriage is "likely to have harmful psychological and physical effects." These are part of the "A-H definition," requirements for programs to receive abstinence funding under Title V of the Social Security Act.  The second one seems pretty horrible to me. It also doesn't seem like there are requirements for discussion of contraceptives or safer sex, which means they could be left out entirely. That is bad and means schools that get title V don't have to have conprehensive sex ed with abstinence promotion, they can have plain old abstinence-only ed.
True dat, and Jesus isn't the only one who had this happen. Statues of the Buddha started looking suspiciously Greek once Alexander the Great showed up, and went crazy and turned into the fat super asian buddha as Buddhism spread farther East.
Such pretty breasts!
Sigh....then who was phone?
Thank you for saving me from the troll.
Get one of [these](http://www.amazon.com/Decker-BB7B-12-Volt-Battery-Booster/dp/B000H774BY). Will save your ass if you ever kill your battery and already has a handy dandy car charger port. 
I can see why all of those would be your favorite things!
A simple but deadly drinking game - **FIVES**  Okay, so you need a least three people to play this game. As with any drinking session though - the more the merrier! Before the game starts, you need to get one empty pint glass and place it in the middle. Everyone in the group pours a bit of whatever alcoholic drink they have in their own glass (beer, vodka, baileys etc.) into the empty glass to make the ''dirty pint''. The person who loses this game has to drink the ''dirty pint'' which should be kept in the middle.  Now onto the game itself. The aim of the game is to guess the total number made by the group. When you guess correctly you're out of the group and are safe from drinking the ''dirty pint''.  Everyone keeps one hand behind their back and on the count of three they place their hand in the middle revealing what they've decided to do (a bit like when you play rock, paper, scissors). Now you can do two things: 1) Keep your hand **opened** to indicate the number 5; 2) Keep your hand **clenched** in a fist to indicate the number 0.  So, you go round the group one-by-one saying out loud what you think the total number will be. If it is your turn to guess the total number you still have to put your hand in the middle and indicate a 5 or a 0. You have to shout out your guess whilst the ''1,2,3 - show'' count is being made.  For example, we have a group of four people. Mid-way through the count of three - Person 1, guesses that the total number will be '15'. After the count of three, all four people show their hands. Three of the four have their hands open (3x5), whilst the other one has their hand clenched (1x0). In this instance, the total number in the group is 15 , so as Person 1 guessed correctly s/he is out of the game and can drink their own drink at their own pace. (Although, its wise not to drink to much of your own drink whilst playing this game because it may inhibit your ability to finish off the ''dirty pint'' if you lose the game). Person 1 can then watch as the others get anxious and nervous because the probability that they'll have to drink the ''dirty pint'' has just increased. Its gets awesome to watch but nerve-racking to play, when its gets down to the final two people.  Its a bit of a long-winded explanation but hope its clear. Have fun!
Listen to Ulrich Schnauss too
Why is there so much hate for NSW? T_T
Depends on your team size.  If you have a large team - which Amarok does - then a re-write (assuming you have good vision) allows everyone to work on their part and then intigrate latter.   Refactoring part be part requires has a lot of places where only one person can work.   You end up with one developer announcing a code freeze for the next week while he fixes everyone's interfaces to use the new changes.   Most version control can't handle merges well, so you can't really start on the next refactoring until the current one is done.
Well you'll have to level up each weapon (job) so there is that aspect of repetitiveness. Who knows, we'll have to see.
Flooding the subreddit
...Where do you find these gems.
I can type over 150wpm at 99% accuracy. 
they were waiting with the cops. They thought their older daughter had abducted their younger daughter.
Hmm, our vet's nutritionist said it was pretty healthy, but I see there is a lot of crap in it. Do you have any dry foods that you would recommend?
You're damn right you creepy little... shit.
That's an Atlas Moth :(
Personally I'm glad the writers got over the whole "The Doctor uses the sonic screwdriver to get out of jams too often" phobia. I think it's a well known facet of the show to fans but it's also a hallmark of his personality.
I think that's the April Fool's gag?  Wild goose chase, perhaps.
SOCIALISM!
I like you, digifxplus. You're all right. MUCH obliged ;) 
If he was a girl he wouldn't be allowed to rule over men, its in the bible.
Can't wait until Lord of the Rings custom maps. Can anyone say Gandalf arbiter or Sauron collosus?
What about the bacteria? Bacteria and other micro organisms make up most of your body weight!
On the plus side - decent subpixel smoothing
What the FUCK!?  If this is true, Pittsburgh is on my permanent shit list.
Bought a car from my (at the time) gf's friend.  She was the second owner and had it for quite some time, said it runs perfect.  I test drove it and it was fine, had it checked out by a mechanic, thought on it a few days, and we decided to buy it.  Within a day of owning the car it started sputtering and couldn't make any power.  I checked basic stuff buy couldn't find anything.  We got in touch to say, hey this isn't what we agreed on, this car isn't working and we trusted you that it would be.  Past the first one where they confirmed they hadn't done *anything at all* to it in the interim period they wouldn't return any phone calls and wouldn't even come to the door, for weeks.  That's the closest I've ever come to vandalizing someone's house (but didn't.)  I was so disgusted with it I let it sit.  Turns out "not doing anything" was actually cleaning the engine bay by blasting it with water - since I had noticed the engine bay was quite clean they specifically denied having done so.   Once I got over my anger and realized they lied about not having done anything it was obvious they had no idea or made a mistake when cleaning the engine bay.  I removed the spark plugs and let it dry out over a couple weeks.  Car ran just fine after that.   They directly lied to me about not having done anything, if they'd just told me the fucking truth I would have figured it out much sooner and not lost them as a friend.  Don't lend money to friends unless you consider it a gift, and don't buy or sell cars to friends.  Sure, sometimes both will go ok, but sometimes things get royally fucked.
Creation screams chaos, not god.  There not only doesn't have to be a supreme being, but most likely there isn't in the sense of a god.  Maybe more advanced alien cultures, or even more advanced cultures who may have existed epochs ago (such as the legend of Atlantis), but no fairytale god. Saying that all cultures have a supreme being in no way confirms that there is one, seeing as how most religions evolved from one set of beliefs.  Since the major religions are based on pagan beliefs, they've since simply been manipulated and evolved into what they are now.  Just as you say, you were brought up to believe.  Since generation after generation people have been doing everything in their power to convince each other of a god, obviously most people will believe in it blindly.  Sorry to also put your other beliefs down, but at the time of Jesus, there were several hundred other messiah's.  It was by chance and a dash of coincidence that Jesus was chosen to be the representative of the son of god.  Keep in mind, that even in the same geographical areas there were quite a few messiah's also claiming they were the sons of god.  To add the the sad reality of the lie people are "brought up" to believe is that there really is no archeological proof Jesus really existed, since the first mention of Jesus is near 80 years after his supposed death and reincarnation. If he was such an important figure, don't you think someone would have mentioned him in those 80 years or so?  I believe the first mention would have been by King James himself, whom coincidentally also set Jesus's birth date to what we accept it as now. And I'm not about to call you narrow-minded, however blind belief is just that.  Projecting your beliefs on the world you live in because you think anything amazing must be of god is simply turning your back on the evolution of human understanding, scientifically and spiritually.
The rule in my family was always "old enough to kill, old enough to drink"
Tiny stares for tiny tits. 
I use [git-sh](http://github.com/rtomayko/git-sh) which is a little similar.
How does/did your boyfriend feel about all that?  He disappears from the story pretty quickly.
I have one from 1983 that I love just for the "history" lesson it provides.  edit: fixed very funny typo
Lapidus is my homeboy.
Enjoyed.
at the same exact point when the loony lefties were responsible for their anti-Bush rhetoric.
Oh, man. She really got shafted.   Well, without passing any judgement whatsoever on you patient, I'll tell of a similar case that resulted from a botched vasectomy. The family starting looking for a family to adopt. Not only did they find one, but the family they found was Thai (like them), well off, and had been trying to for conceive for over 10 years. It was a win/win for everyone. The receiving family even payed for all birth-related expenses (which, after some quick help from Google, seems pretty common). 
As long as it took him to publish it -/+ 2 weeks.
Figure out how much you value playing with your friends vs making progress in ICC. Keep in mind that you don't necessarily have to raid with your guildmates.. they should be able to see that you're frustrated with their lack of progression and not begrudge you the opportunity to raid with others.  Then you can run pug ICC10s and hopefully find a group that runs regularly (ideally, another small guild that doesn't quite have 10 people, but whose players are more skilled than in your guild).
Dammit. My logic is flawed.
I'd have to say [Room of Angel](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Td7MTIOYV3s) is the best piece of music ever written for a video game, but there are probably countless others that I'm missing.
&gt;Maybe they shouldn't have mentioned someone's name specifically,  Maybe??? An innocent person is dead, now.  If they have to do this, why don't they pick people who don't exist, and make up a name.
Looks like a version of the Eiffel tower that was hit by a fucking car. And FTR: London didn't pick it, a rich self publicizing Indian billionaire picked it. 
So he was being funny?  [Oh I see](http://wiki.answers.com/Q/How_is_American_Humor_different_from_English_Humor).  Well that makes sense then.
I DO LOVE HOW APPARENTLY IT'S FINE IF THE ONLY WAY TO WIN...IS TO SHOOT PEOPLE IN THE FACE.  HOW DOES THIS REPORTER NOT SEE THE HYPOCRISY? HOW IS THAT NOT IMMEDIATELY OBVIOUS TO *ANYONE*?  EDIT: STUFF
A no kissing policy. No policy? No grounds for stopping it. 
I've found Dear Science by TV on the Radio to be good travelling music, whether by train, plane or boat.
Isn't a URL more typing than just a search term?
I could have lied.....RHCP
I learned persian food first, which got my basic techniques down. Persian food is very similar to desi food, even sharing a lot of the same terminology, but with different (very little) spices.  From there the jump to desi food was very simple.   I went to school for biochemistry, but ended up working in IT. The kitchen is basically my lab fix. I suggest eating critically, pay close attention to everything about the food that you eat when you are out and about, and keep that in mind when you are developing a strategy for reproducing it at home.  Good ingredients also help, and so does good equipment, you could be having a hard time getting things to taste right because your cookware is reacting to your dinner. Also, you need to learn to cook rice. Westerners have no idea how to cook rice, the best rice in the world is made by Iranians, so I suggest picking up a cookbook by Namijah Batmanlij and really get your rice skills going. It'll help when you are doing biryani or pulao or yakhni.   Like anything else, its all about having sound foundational skills, being observant, and having enough experience to figure out when things are going south early on. They only way to get those skills is trigger time and learning from the mistakes that you will make.
Props to this guy for not giving a shit!
Some people don't equate 'respect and honor' with 'money' . I for one could make much more money in another field, but I prefer the one I'm in morally and ethically.
In terms of profit, that's probably the right thing to do.  It sucks, but that's the way it is.
HOLLY!  What a pile of HORSESHIT!  Get a life troll!
"I CUT YA DICK OFF!!!"
I have a sure fire plan.  I have a lot of capital available, but the government has frozen my assets.  I have a lawyer who can get my assets released for $10K.  Western Union it to me, and I'll wire you back $20k (is negotiable) in 6 weeks or so.  Then repost here with your doubled money.  
Yes. Yes I am. Stop being obstinate. This is basic kitchen safety.  I was badly burned working in a restaurant when I was around 20 (second degree burns preventing me from using my left hand 5 days or so while the open blisters healed) by a drop of water hitting oil. It's amazing how much oil a drop of water can jettison from a pan. It can be explosive.  And yes, like everyone else has said, just because *you* haven't been hurt, doesn't mean it's safe. It isn't.
There's some crazy stuff out there, it's just not very common.
what is this shit
When they're that big, I'm guessing it could seem like we're looking at something else.
Small, private college in Arizona.   Studying for a dual degree in Network Security/Computer Forensics. &lt;3  Also, I notice a lot of Ents from Michigan. My home town is a small city outside of Benton Harbor. =]
i do! when i used to have carpet id also drag my feet around making trails. i hate being on the phone and pace around like a wound-up dog in an apartment with a low fire alarm battery beep
I've been on a lot of bc indeed. So far it's been shot, about 4 kinds of pills, ring, patch. I'm aiming for IUD. The shot was my favorite because I didn't have periods on it. Ever. I mean, the first 3 months I bled, but that's not uncommon, and then I didn't have periods for 3 years. The best 3 years ever. And I've had a kid, so the IUD shouldn't be too bad, it's worse for those who haven't had one. IDK when I'll upgrade/switch, my old insurance didn't cover it, haven't asked the new insurance.
Some Duncan Hines or Betty Crocker cake/brownie/cookie mix. You won't be disappointed.
Also there cant wait for 420!
I think this might be my [favorite one](http://wtf.thebizzare.com/images/Ghana-Movie-Poster-3.jpg).
Ambrosia makes some serious gems, the EV series being a good example.  However, had I not purchased EV Nova 5 or so years ago, I would be a little pissed that it's still 30 bucks.  Ambrosia seriously needs to learn the concept of aging, as well as sales. They've been making games since a couple years after I was born, and I've been following them since then.  I remember thinking "when I get older, I'll buy EV &amp; Harry the Handsome Executive, plus they'll be cheaper".  Not so. It's now 16 years later and even the games that are 16 years old are still full price. In fact, with the exception of Maelstrom and a couple others, they are all still full price &amp; OS 9 only.
I brought you flours.
At least the window uses Segoe.
[The real Snow White.](http://userserve-ak.last.fm/serve/_/12055317/Adriana+Caselotti+200pxAdriana_caselotti.jpg)
They're the box, the disc is inside.  ACTUALLY, I also stole Photoshop v2 from work. I have the huge, heavy boxes as well, I'll take a photo!
but but but Ron Paul says it aint so.  It's like Paul wants to return us to the time Upton Sinclair wrote about.
Well, I'd be going for work.  I don't know how often I'd be going out to bars or anything either.  I was told that all the fun happens on the other islands, though.
Maybe Americans don't get his humor then
I'm fucking using that... you are my hero.
[This one made me laugh](http://i.imgur.com/uSBsh.png)
Imagine (all|the day) (the|when) (people| "Sudo)  (make me a [pickup notes]) (living| sandwich") (for|is normal) (today|conversation)... etc
just made a great song even better...plus that girl's pretty hot.
Yep sweet potato fries are excellent.  Slice, toss with olive oil and some spices (I often just do a generic italian seasoning blend) salt and pepper, bake at 350 for 45 minutes (times will vary greatly).  It also helps to open the door very briefly once or twice during baking to let the steam out.
Do it.  Stat.
Wow look like he just opened a gateway to a new dimension with that.
"Biaatch" WTF?
Would have been harder if he used mustard, that crap stings.
he's still a lying liar
More importantly is the fact that there seems to be some form of event going on centered around a life-sized representation of the Ninja Turtles [battle van](http://www.automopedia.org/wp-content/uploads/2009/03/turtlevan.jpg).
If you fry at 325-400F or thereabouts you shouldn't end up with oil in your food because your food should be ejecting a cushion of steam keeping the oil off of the food. It's very similar to a drop of water dancing on a hot skillet.
That doesn't make sense.  There's no such time.
An intelligent alien Santa? That would explain a lot.
I'm pleased that you like it!  YouTube seems to have [died for everyone](http://downforeveryoneorjustme.com/youtube.com)
You are never going to have your old life back. It's over.  It's always going to be different - from now until the day you die... So things are always going to be different -- but you will find joy again.   Have you thought of maybe taking a week off -- I didn't get to do that for like the first 7 years of my oldest boy's life... but I'll tell you -- sometimes just having a little time away... especially if you can re-capture the romance with your wife... and time to re-devote yourselves to each other... when you come back -- you will see things a little better.  I remember being so excited to get that week off -- after all those years - and the first 2-3 days it was pretty damn awesome.. but then -- I found I was really really missing my little fellow... and felt like there was this big part of me missing. It was wonderful to come back home. 
How would he fuck the world without a dick?
And he only looks like he's about thirty.  Maybe the life of a civilian pilot really ages a man inside.
Well hello thar, RageX. You appear to be lost. Can I help you find a nice evening meal?   *grins wickedly*
This movie was on TV when I lost my virginity.  I was super proud I lasted the last scene and the credits.
I wonder if this really would be feasible if battery technology for automobiles improved drastically enough to allow for 400-500 mile trips.
Thank you so much haha. I was just about to say Tomba! and Tomba 2. Two of my favorite games of all time. I got them when they first came out and still have them. =]
Laguna Presa conq has them too.
If it isn't the power supply then odds are it is the motherboard.
Oh I see, you're not paedophiles, you're just rapists! Well that's fine then, see you at church!
where did you take the dam to?
Because this is reddit.
So much for the 'paleo diet is a fad diet for hipsters' meme. 
exactly, which is why they changed the feature set. because it's capitalism and they have the right to charge whatever they want and can include whatever features they want.
You're just fine, floppy. Usually its the people who don't rebel as teens that we have to worry about.  ;)  Just continue to think for yourself and view things with a critical eye. Just because you got to this point in your beliefs with some conflict doesn't mean you're wrong somehow. Doesn't mean it's the end of your search for truth, either, keep learning!
Its all greek to me
Me too.
A man who says, "Rather to die in absolute doubt than to die in euphoria at the price of a lie" cannot ever be considered a successor of Friedrich Nietzsche — life requires lying for Nietzsche. The question is whether the lie is a productive lie or not.  Also, it seems rather unfortunate that he has been connected to Nietzsche primarily because of his criticism of the church. If all people get out of Nietzsche is "church is bad" then they're reading him rather lazily, and without any attempt to understand him.
According to the standard practices instigated by the GOP, these guys are enemy combatants, so we can start torturing them now.  We can also include all the recent terrorists who have been attacking offices of congressmen.
I'll go out on a leaf here and say I concur. My mouth was agape. 
You should have just left, if you didn't do anything they can't keep you there. 
I think you took the wrong approach. You can't just sit down and immediately ask them to qualify themselves (by asking them what makes them interesting).  I don't know what stories you told after that, but it sounds like you skipped the entire smalltalk/building repartee phase of the conversation and dove right into LET'S GET TO KNOW EACH OTHER REALLY WELL which, I think, is sort of creepy.  Still, shit happens. Props (or whatever people say now) for the 10 approaches a month thing. Keep it up!
I did.  So they do that to give WB breathing room on their sales, hmm.  Did you read my article?  Why doesn't Blockbuster?  
It's from an Ad agency in India.  Wouldn't be legal in the US: can't use public property for private advertising.
Someone earlier in the thread said months. What's the risk window? Do I need to cancel this CC or what?
No, I'm confused, so thank-you for your thoughts and insights.
my bad
Looks more like a moth, but I could be wrong.  Any redditor entomologists around to identify?
If you have, I hope it wasn't for Jimbo. (Undercover Boss Reference)  http://www.cbs.com/primetime/undercover_boss/video/?pid=bcJKZ1a40XeUAraELQJHzyiRHA7fVnZx&amp;vs=Default&amp;play=true
Step 1: turn on LHC  Step 2: ?????  Step 3: Science!
&gt; Sydnians  Sydneyites.
I hope your friend is ok!
I just ate a pizza 5 minutes ago by not putting it on a tray. It was delicious.
I learned that the hard way.  My fiance proposed to me with a white twist-tie he'd twisted into a ring, asking if I'd marry him when he could afford a ring (of course I didn't care if he could afford one or not).  Struck by genius, though, I decided to take it to a local jeweler's and see if they could make mold for a real ring based on the twist-tie. They got really excited, but I would have to leave the twist-tie with them so they could take time molding it and making the ring.  In the meantime, I'd been wearing the twist-tie just like a regular ring, so I had to find another white bread tie to wear so he didn't know something had happened to the original. I was in the bread aisle for almost a fucking hour trying to find a white tie. A couple times the produce guy kept looking at me like I was insane, and eventually came over asking if he could help me.  I finally found a loaf with a white tie on the bottom shelf in the very back.  It took something like four or five weeks before I got the ring and original tie back, but the ring is fucking awesome; silver and a CZ, so it wasn't expensive, but it's better than anyone else's engagement ring. (Will post pics tomorrow if requested)  **UPDATE**: [Pictures!](http://www.flickr.com/photos/48929047@N02/sets/72157623624776333/) My favorite part is actually the underside of the ring, which is distinctly twist-tie-y. It's either a size 6 1/2 or 7, and I went for a pretty small CZ so the ring was really mostly a twist-tie. Most people just think it's a unique ring until I tell them the story, and then they freak out. I included a picture of the original twist-tie, as well as the two of us in the same fifth grade class (he switched schools the next year, I asked him to go on a date with me, and then I didn't see him for 11 years) -- and the two of us now.  Also, the ring was made by [Grimball's Jewelers](http://www.grimballjewelers.com/) in Chapel Hill, NC.
I don't think we actually know how they are chosen yet.
That sentence was grating to me, but it's understandable. Your average reader has no idea who Xavier Leroy or any of his companies are, but *everyone* knows the name Microsoft. Tracing ML to F# certainly skips over a lot, but it does help relate Milner's work something most people know.
That *you've* ever had!
I thought it was Gandalf and Steve Jobs
In case you aren't joking: Neverending probably refers to the fact that the book is in some ways, interactive to the person reading it, so that the world in the story continiues to change as different people read it.  I have also had a theory about the names of the only 2 people to have read the book, according to the book. That is Bastian Bathazar Bux and C.C.Coreander. It is hard not to infer that there is a A.A.A. somewhere waiting to read the book. Perhaps that is the author's proxy for the books present reader?  The book that Bastian reads inside the book is not the book that we read, BUT  the book that the Old Man of the Wandering Mountain writes clearly is the book that we are reading. Very interesting to think about.
wat
Well, it *is* German made.
Carp canceled Murder: Interrupted by Continent.
I've been there, and it is awful. I am so, so sorry.   Let me just say this, and I have NO idea of your situation: I was really, really angry at my father and supported my mother the entire time and really didn't talk to my dad much. To my mind, he cheated and it was inexcusable.   But then you realize that people are complicated, and relationships are hard, and I've always regretted not being there for my dad during that really tough time. Yeah, he brought it on himself, but my mom was 50 percent of that relationship, and a huge part of the problem.   As much as it hurts, try to remember they are both your parents and both love you sooo much. Try not to take sides too much, and lean on your friends right now. Odds are some of your good friends will know exactly what you're going through and will be able to help you through.  Good luck, and there are people who know and care about your pain.  
&gt; hallow.  hollow.  Hallow usually means to attribute a holy or protected status to something.
I loved that font so much in middle school.
"You kiss better than my Daddy."
I enjoy it because of the characters. They don't go into much depth into them sadly, but it gives reasons for all these people to act like they do. Most Final Fantasy's nowadays are cookie cutter characters with whom I feel no attachment. I would have loved for them to go into more depth with the characters, but it might ruin it I guess. I don't know any of my friends that played the game that have the same main party either. That shows a lot of diversity in the game as well. It is and probably forever will be my favorite RPG. I play through it about once every couple of years or so just to make sure.
Oh my fuck guys. Seriously. I ordered 17 and they came with an extra internet!
it's down for me
I know not what I do, please forgive me. I can't stop lovin' you. Don't deny me, this pain I'm going through. 
I can't be sure, but I think the OP was asking about something distinct from absolute truth. He was asking something like "is there a true statement for which it is impossible to believe otherwise".  &gt; then you've just answered your own question.  What question?
He approaches...
http://code.google.com/chrome/chromeframe/
They also make their nipples less sensitive and hurt their back.
Boooo
Shadow of the Colossus is an excellent example of the type of "Virtual Solitaire" which will never be as socially acceptable as any movie.  I played Shadow of the Colossus front to back.  I love the music.  I climbed to the top of the temple.  I finished most of the time trials.  My commitment to the game was way more than is involved in ANY MOVIE.  The longest movie I've ever watched was Solaris.  And that was only 5 hours or whatever. Everyone thought I was insane for watching Solaris, a five hour movie.  How much moreso am I insane for investing 60 hours in a game!  Hmm... If you want to compare games to something, try a TV series.  They have a large time commitment and require learning a lot about the characters and plot.  Following a TV series religiously is kinda popular... but not as popular as watching the occasional movie.  Maybe certain kinds of games could compared to TV series.  What do you think?  edit:  I'd note though that in my opinion Wander (the SotC player character) never objectively grew or developed in anything as complex a manner as any character in any TV series I have ever watched.
On the other hand, those guys have already got their machines.  If that was the case then Sony could simply discontinue Linux support on all future models, and be done with it - with less outrage from existing customers.
And Earthworm Jim 2.  I can still hear those poor puppies going SPLAT.
I keep it because the twist tie because it has the expiry date on it.
Dude wake n bake is the best! I smoke all day but that first one to my dome when I wake up is the best all day.
Let's get started!
Sorry: that should have been "Trypophobia."   O NOES! EVEN WORSER: [NSFW](http://i7.tinypic.com/21bobwn.png)
That's impossible to tell on a superficial meeting, so I don't get it.
How much money could we make? 
I am playing Dark Project right now (found it in a box after playing it years ago) Metal Age is next!
I wonder what the cost to set up such a system would be, I wondered if it would be profitable? Something tells me it wont happen without either an immediate need or legislation. That being said I would fully support this, and I would try to get some solar tech investments beforehand ;)
[Here's an article that might help you understand why people like these things.](http://www.wicknet.org/english/English%2011/Voices%20II/Grotesques/Why%20We%20Crave%20Horror%20Movies.html)
[Yes](http://finance.yahoo.com/news/Cisco-dropping-Linksys-brand-apf-3771170027.html?x=0)
Didn't say it was yours, it's still a blog and the link you provided is still spam compared to the source link.
Anyone in nyc?  I might  I cant leave nyc though, i love this place way too much
I was referring to the little guy on the left.
Godwin's!
Yeah I do get that. I'm just not sure about 'web programming languages'. Most applications I've seen of Pi-Calc to programming languages have either been in simulation or academia.
So in the joke he's like 75 years old? 
Shhhhhhh!
Albums may have good and bad songs, but are usually better together  Dark Side of the Moon and The Red Album both have songs that are pretty good alone, but put together are just so much more than the sum of their parts  And yes, Dragonforce does have some ripping songs, though they sound too similar for me to like a whole album.  I do like alot of their singles though
&gt; the patients are conscious, instead of not unconscious  I don't know if you heard me, but I said a **TOOL. UP MY DICK.**
If nothing else, owners might see fewer acts of vandalism :) The vandalism was actually a big factor in some relatives' decisions to get a new car much sooner than they would've otherwise.
Troll posts can take any number of forms. Sometimes they appear to be benign inquiries into subjects that are very emotive and controversial, as this one did. There is no single definition of "troll" but usually the best one I've found is "someone who says things they either do not believe, or which are wild exaggerations of what they *do* believe, for the sole purpose of starting arguments and flame wars."  We left the thread up because lots of good discussion happened in it. That's happened many times with troll threads across Reddit. If it gets discussion going, so be it. :P
That may be the case, I will fucking hate him till I'm dead for that.
I lost it at "In just six minutes a day, you can get arms that can jerk off a rhinoceros."
&gt;  Graft and corruption from all sources should be rooted out.  Cutting the military budget indiscriminately will do more damage than good.
Protein shakes.  Why? Because they are protein, and I add a vegetable/fruit extract, psyllium husk and cinnamon to my shakes, which are chocolate originally.  So my diet contains chocolate cinnamon smoothies with a hint of berry.
I think it's funny when people offer orangereds to other people. By the time they read the comment they've most likely already clicked the orangered.
&gt;Australian rules football, which he likened to "rugby with a thong".  I absolutely love this quote!
A six pack of natty ice and some beer nuts to cover the taste.
Well it's true in vim - commands are so expressive that it has a significative impact on your cognitive load. I don't think that i am so "absorbed" when using automatic refactor tools in other higher-level IDEs. 
Is it worse to eat a lot of sugar at once or the same amount spread over a longer period?  Is it worse to binge on sugar right before sleeping?
ITS A TRAP
They give people the sedative I think so that they dont freak out and start jumping through time like Desmond did when he passed through in the helicoptor.
What the hay. I put in as well - http://www.myspace.com/agentsforharm
Can you explain this a little bit? I'm not at all familiar with this.
Troll Hunters are super fun. Especially in BG's where I can get away with wearing my full armor pen PvE gear :D. Troll because why roll any other race?
&gt; none of them, because of potential legal issues (additional font licenses)  this is why i also don't use any images
Someone also brought watermelon, which I loved.
Because gas is fucking cheap. http://www.inflationdata.com/inflation/images/charts/Oil/Gasoline_inflation_chart.htm
&gt; and only someone who has never READ it would claim otherwise.  Wow.  There's so much ignorance in your post it's astounding.  Most "christian" churches do not even pick up their bibles a majority of the time and the only bible thinking you've seem done is taken a bunch of verses out of context.(way out of context, we're not just talking semantics)  It's awesome how there are atheists in these subreddits who manage to sound as reactionary and idiotic as any faux news personality.  If you'd like some real discussion on these things head on over to infidels.org. We'd love to mock you.   -an educated atheist
does gravity have a speed limit....like light say?
hey, dont make fun of the retired
Well, if you climb up the vi learning curve, you would see that copy and paste takes a while to explain because they are implemented on top of a more general mechanism.  Once you understand those multiple paragraphs, you can copy a whole block of text in a few keystrokes, but you have also learned how to delete that block of text, or indent it, or pipe it through a filter (shell command), or save that block of text to a new file, or whatever.  In other words, it's like someone asking how to create and use a `Map&lt;String,Integer&gt;` in Java.  Once you've explained how to call a constructor, and explained a bit about generics, and explained about iterators (or about the special `for` loop syntax), you've answered their question.  But they also know a lot more about Java than just how to use a map.
You can see the steering wheel and console at the very end when he pans the camera around. 
Wave goodbye puny humans.
When I was younger I didn't really think about growing up, but I certainly wasn't looking forward to it. As if working hard in school wasn't enough, now I'm expected to do more work.
The iPad that's being released this weekend is the WiFi only model. It's not capable of using a data plan, so it's certainly not tied to one.
Actually, what are the terms?  Is this a full-time, permanent gig through a recruiter, or a contract gig through an agency?  I was thinking it was the latter, but that may not be accurate.
I use the time-tested technique of letting it grow.  I have a fairly decent Brawn electric for the areas above the natural line between the corners of my mouth and my sideburns, as well as my neck.
Yeah, I don't get it. Care to explain it to me?
Why have you not given up Reddit? 
*(Michael Scott)*
If pb cookies = an anus and pink ice cream cookies = a bajingo, then yeah.  
Who gives a shit what they think?  Cops are pretty piss poor in general at accummulating *actual* evidence when you didn't commit a crime (mostly because it doesn't exist).  If you don't give them any every cop in the city can think you did it and they cannot convict you.  One wrong word and you'll be in prison before you know it.  
Well, then you were being unsafe.  I've been cooking since a child - I am 47 - and never burned myself with oil and water.  
The most cited article involving this is [here](http://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/15147528). As interesting as the coffee/diabetes correlation is, the mechanism by which such a correlation occurs is basically unknown.
Twenty four hour pet shop - perfect if you run out after midnight.  Doesn't need to be big or even in a nice area, just floor to ceiling small furry mammals in cages and open all the time.   You know it makes sense.  Insider tip - make sure you always have a goat, especially at weekends.
first trial in a **crown court**.  there have been jury-less magistrate trials for centuries.  &gt; The case was the first crown court criminal trial to be held without a jury in England and Wales for more than 350 years.   http://news.bbc.co.uk/1/hi/england/london/8597298.stm
Jesus had a penis.
Because the world has been male dominated since the beginning of time. Whats that saying? Only the victors record history.
If you're just using the PS3 as a cheap supercomputer running Linux, why would you ever run any of the firmware updates from Sony at all?  Did some of the previous firmware updates fix things with the Linux OS or something?
I can't wait until I start walking into my classroom and kids put up signs that say "Tits or GTFO"
Bike Mania 2  SteamBirds  City Destroyer
It's repetitive, but I always kinda liked it.  The game was equally repetitive, and I liked it too.  
yup. but I was a dumb teenager that didn't know better.
*I thought it was fairly clear.*   The very fact that we're having a discussion about it means it was not clear.  I disagree with your other assessments.
University of georgia anyone?
Well, that government would not exist without the support of the U.S.  But, other than that, it's not our problem or our business.
Brilliant. Videos of many of the songs available on DVD, too!  I loved the interview over the ending credits, too.
I wish people who know nothing about physics would stop trying to use physics metaphors. It doesn't work.   Of course, the Buddha knew nothing about atoms. The interesting thing is that the Buddha talked about the human condition in a way that is independent of circumstantial things like physics or technology. He didn't need to know about atoms. 
Not unless you can convince everyone to fight tickets. Of course, then they will just raise the cost of a ticket so if you don't get away with it you are fucked.
He's too worn out from arguing with virgins.
'I really mean it', Professor Nutt said.  I had an opportunity to try E once and as the cool guy that I am, I spent a few hours researching about it before trying. The risks are quite great for such a little pill. Besides, I'm not attracted by long-lasting drugs.
You do realize that we are human beings and prone to error?  We are not always going to have successful communication, and there is a risk involved when communicating with someone--it may be unsuccessful and make the situation worse.
Here's how it went down:   Dude has party. Someone shits in a container. Some other drunk/high dude thinks its a good idea to piss in the shit container. They think it's even funnier if they close the container, and let it incubate in the sun, cause then the poor bastard who opens it to find out what is inside will get blasted with a nasty whiff of sewage.  10 hours later, everyone wakes up. Dude sees container full of unknown substance. Opens up the lid and takes a whiff. Proceeds to have hallucinations. After coming down from this awesome high, his friends tell him it was piss and shit. He says, "duuuuuuuude, we'll never have to pay for drugs again."  
&gt; Although we do kill millions of pigs and cows for all that yummy bacon and burgers. But what if I decided to shoot my golden retriever? Just because he was annoying me and I was tired of him. So I take him out in the back yard and POW right between the eyes. I'm not cool with that.  Does that give you no cognitive dissonance?  You're fine with killing animals smarter and more self-aware than your dog, but then somehow single him out as more deserving of rights?  I get being partial to him just because you know him, but you certainly can't claim that he has any real rights *whatsoever* if you don't think the other animals do as well.
Normally about every other day, but sometimes I will smoke every day for a period of time. Right now I'm on a t-break though.
UIC
My favorite story in this genre is the one where Steve Jobs needs help putting together the innerds for a video game and offers Steve Wozniac half of the proceeds (Jobs says about $800) if Woz finishes the job.  (I'm quoting this from memory, so feel free to correct me or fill in the gaps if you want.) Woz does it in 3 days and gets $400.  Later on, Woz is sitting on a plane next to a guy from the company that sold the game and tells his story.  The guy on the plane then reveals that Jobs actually got paid $8,000.  Woz said that he actually cried when he found this out.  F^ck you Steve Jobs, F^ck you indeed.
Q: If the IRA is purely a 'nationalistic' organisation, how come none of it's members were Protestants?   I understand what you are saying that religion was not at the forefront of the IRA's politics, but you cannot deny that religious sectarianism &amp; 'out-group' hatred was at the very heart of the struggle in the first place. 
lol...look at yourself dumbass. fyi: great way to change the subject and avoid a legitimate answer regarding Operation Northwoods and Gulf of Tonkin.
hella!
I don't really like Australians anymore. On average I find that they are rude, full of themselves and a bit trashy.  I actually steer clear of working with them, when I can.
"That game was so hot, I'd get it pregnant for $20...and I'd induce labor for another $5."   (Tracy M.)
a girl once told me i had beautiful eyes in a parking lot. i knew she was lying and wanted to rape me then chop me up or something because i dont have beautiful eyes.
Na, I got that about the "support" thing, I was suprised you hadn't seen it, I download anything I'm interested in. What do you mean "Junk store," though? I imagine an actual junkyard and you try to sell junk(trash) on ebay.  That's cool that your coworkers are okay with it but what happened with your family?
Those dancing arcade machines at the movie theatres and such are a sad glimpse into society.
This sounds like some kind of surreal cinema...
Asheron's Call
Subscribed, thanks! I will direct further smoking experiment questions there from now on.
We used to play a game in bars called "Point 'n Mac" where we would send our friends (guys mostly, sometimes girls) up to random strangers to hit on them with preselected and often awful, offensive pickup lines. It's an international sensation. You may have been an unwitting participant in someone's Point 'n Mac game. It's quite surprising how often some really bad pickup lines work.
On my screen, I can see the top of their name. Like they forgot to raise the "height" of the passenger names on the HUD with respect to the Apacahe. So it kind of overflows the size of the screen. Look carefully next time or try adjusting the aspect ratio of your screen and you might get a glimpse of the top part of the letters in their name.
I was getting all riled up, saying "I'm going to make a farcical graphic.  This is bullshit."  Very appreciative.
She was a girl first, but got serious penis envy when Thor rolled by...
Whatever happened to the great Republican aversion to all things "celebrity"?
Seagulls are fucking evil... look a seagull in the eyes and you'll see!
&gt;I'm sure you've asked yourselves 'why do girls like a*holes?' It's cause we dig confidence, and they have that in spades.  At first I thought this said "Why do girls like holes?", and I saw "dig" and "spades" and thought it was a lame pun about digging holes.  But it turned out not to be.
Ultimate Frisbee.
And it's made even more hilarious when a couple show up and one of them isn't wearing red. Leads to good times. Except for the couple.
&gt; imagine this movie coming out now http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0853096/ however it was totally okay when bush was in office. Well, that one is new to me.  I wonder why. &gt; 21 December 2006 (South Korea) No wonder.  It was only released in South Korea.  No, it was not acceptable during the Bush years any more than it would be acceptable today.  Condoning violence against living Presidents is simply unacceptable no matter what party they're affiliated with. &gt; and so we're clear.. there were plenty of threats against Bush http://www.zombietime.com/zomblog/?p=621 *There you go.*  Now you're actually backing up your claims.  Bravo.  So, where are the death threats against the rest of the GOP?  C'mon, you're the one claiming the Left is no different from the Teabaggers.  Now you're 2 for 5. &gt; I've never heard any of the pundits condone violence, in fact it's quite the opposite. Oops.  And you were doing so well. [Michael Graham: Pelosi was "asking for" response by carrying Medicare gavel](http://mediamatters.org/mmtv/201003250062) (with video). [Doocy responds to threats on Democratic lawmakers by saying "maybe" people are "angry" because "they didn't want this bill"](http://mediamatters.org/mmtv/201003250001) (again, with video). [In the Wake of Arrests in Three States, Right-Wingers Rush to Defend Terror Suspects, Criticize FBI](http://firedoglake.com/2010/03/29/in-the-wake-of-arrests-in-three-states-right-wingers-rush-to-defend-terror-suspects-criticize-fbi/). And who can miss Newt Gingrich claiming that the health care bill that was passed represented the [greatest threat to the "American way of life since the 1850s"](http://www.openleft.com/diary/18038/newt-speaks-out-the-ashley-todd-party-wont-take-it-anymore)? Oh no, the Republican leadership and pundits haven't been doing *anything* to stir their base to violence.  Not at *all.*
My sympathies. Tell him I still shudder when I think about it. 
On Linux or Windows or OS X?
I changed it to "WTF" and didn't say "FTFY." And then I said "that." Apologies upon apologies.
Just imagine with me for a minute talking to a group of people during a webinar from your home and all of a sudden the window shatters in the room you are in.  How would you react?  Would you wonder what’s going on?  How the hell did that happen?  Would you be able to say… awesome…now I get a new window and carry on with your presentation?
There is -zero- chance of that happening. The new guy must put his stamp on the operation or why else would he be there. So he's going to implement "new ideas" that somehow always end up being a really lousy way of doing it, costing more for less.  I forget which franchise it was [in the Star Wars realm I think], where the executives had the idea of totally overhauling the game, without so much as a by-your-leave [and remember: these guys did a major executive overhaul and they didn't bother informing anyone about it]. The result: the player base, almost to a person packed up and left. The place was dead inside of 3 months or so.  If the new assclown thinks he's going to do something fabulous to make more money and he screws up the gaming experience for people they will just disconnect and stop coming.  After a major managerial change like that things always get worse. I don't even know why Blizzard had to be sold to ActiVision. Blizz was doing fine.
It's a fucking kids shows.  Slightly related, I was on Newsround once when I was kid. Wish I had recorded it.
Nice work, but what a waste of time.  You should have just let transformer-aware fill chew through that.
Let me respond to that with a carefully crafted and eloquent statement...  [_______NOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO!_______](http://www.nooooooooooooooo.com/)
 Yeah, that's the one!
I'd have to get my antenna 50ft off the ground to get reception here. I love where I live, it's beautiful, but bad OTA reception :/
I know no one else who has played this game. I love Threads of Fate. Definitely upvoted. 
That is absolutely disgusting and deplorable.  I hope that all these men and the older sister are prosecuted to the fullest extent of the law.
I've seen this lie many times before, it is a classic and it is central to the renewable delusion:  &gt;The first and most important thing to understand about variability is that grid operators already cope with it on a daily basis. Demand varies constantly, by the hour of the day, by the day of the week and by the season of the year. Grid operators regularly manage a set of generation sources and ramp supplies up and down to match demand. Integrating New Energy sources is, in some ways, more of the same. \[...\] When a nuclear plant crashes there is no warning. Coal plants, dependent on an antiquated transmission system, can be completely out of business in an unpredictable instant from the loss of a single line.  [**My response**](http://uvdiv.blogspot.com/2010/03/uptime-downtime_07.html).
I have fun with my Ele Shammy. I've gone up to the first section of icc10 with him, but have not done to many bg's besides WG. But he has been fun.
Crash Nitro Kart was disappointing. I had been looking forward to a sequel for quite some time, since my CTR disc was out of commission from being used so much.  However, when I got it, it just didn't capture the kart-racing-fun feel that CTR had in spades, and I personally thought even moreso than Mario 64. I loved Mario 64, but CTR is my favorite early 3D kart racer ever.
Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute
Then it's time to ban IE6 from the top. The FCC must block ie6 just as the FDA blocks AIDS bubble gum. It's for your own good.
actually that goes along with true reddiquette which dictates that comments which don't contribute to discussion should be downvoted. "Lol, that is very true." sounds like you're responding to a FB status update or something.
Baby Carlos... Is that you?
upvote for icmag
No, it's the man's fault for raping her. He made the choice to rape her. Women and men alike should not have to exclude themselves from all situations of vulnerability simply because some jackass can't keep it in his or her pants.   My actions are my actions. His actions are his actions. I may wear a short skirt, but that doesn't invite you to put a camera underneath it. 
Web design trolls?
 "Sorry something went wrong.  A team of highly trained monkeys has been dispatched to deal with the situation..."
Here, imagine this in a general sense.  We take a line (one-dimensional), we take another line and move it into a two-dimensional plane and connect them. Now we have a two-dimensional square.  Take another square, move it into a three-dimensional plane and connect them. Now we have a cube.  Take two cubes, move one into *four*-dimensional space and connect them. Now we have a four-dimensional shape most still call a four-dimensional "cube." The idea is impossible to comprehend to a three-dimensional being. It doesn't make sense when you view it, but you can see that we're not dealing with any type of motion we're used to seeing in our daily lives:  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=l_jKXFSgZAQ (Note that this video is only three-dimensional but demonstrates the movements of a four-dimensional object.)  I imagine that learning a game like this would have more to do with paying attention to the *consequences* of four-dimensional movement rather than trying to teach you any sort of hard science. Mainly because demonstrating four-dimensional movement using a two-dimensional medium mimicking the *three*-dimensional world we're used to sounds like a losing battle if they tried it seriously :).
Well, son, if that's what you want to call it.  Your mother and I are still very proud of you.
Well, Jesus wasn't white, either. He didn't have blonde hair or blue eyes. He was a Palestinian Jew.  People have always portrayed Jesus in ways that were the norm for their culture...it just seems strange to us because in a culture where whiteness is dominant we don't notice/think about the race of people who are white. So a portrayal of Jesus that's just as inaccurate passes us by without a thought.
that makes sense, i was thinking electric, which 10 and 11 are heavy gauge but normal for an acoustic.I've never really been a fan but you could try nylon strings for a while.
how the hell did you manage to find that out?
I could really use a Lucky Egg; anything else you're looking for?  I've got an extra Pikachu-colored Pichu and a whole bunch of pokemon with bred movesets. Oh, and I have a ton of BP, so if you want any of the items purchasable there, I can do that too.
I'm down. Remind me in a years time.
no
I'd be long dead.
eh, I'd rather play Bloodline champions. I played moba style games since Dota was released, and I HATE the pve aspect of those games that is required to win the pvp. I played League of legends competitively(cough) and placed in two of the major tournaments (Won about $40 in riot points) but that game has a lot of work ahead of it before it can be considered a true competitive game.
Lol, the funny thing is if you said I was lying, you'd be right.  I don't even own a PS3.  (Not yet at least)
I hear it's a pretty cool place. But my friend from portland convinced me to never move to portland because I would be "hated" for moving there. At least I can visit!
that ... is ... freaky as hell, dude. how much did that run you? 
Feed and clothe 10% of a child, of course!
I think it's actually pretty good. The fish is actually a mud-dwelling fish and doesn't magically grow legs. I took it as the father fish just being sarcastic when it said "look who just evolved." Kind of like saying "well look who just got crowned king!"
Full body latte?
Yeah funny, but it struck a different chord with me.  Sometimes I feel like I can't go my own way without disappointing my father.
Did you request Morocco? would you do Peace Corps again? Did you finish the full 24+ months?
That depends on who you are, if you are asking, it's probably career.
He never said it was a good college. 
Thanks much!  This is exactly the reply I was looking for.  I'll do some research before I dive in.   Also, holy shit dual specs.  I'm jumping on that ASAP.  Thanks again!
the heterosexual male's burden. accept it.
Good thing we have the Patriot Act.......
Google it faggot.
I always picture him in that beret when he's mentioned.
It's metric military time, stupid American.
You were close [Operation Ypsilon](http://www.europeimages.com/en/programmes/2009-operation-ypsilon/)
What are your opinions on the theory of quantum immortality?
Did you miss the "three kids" part?
I was digging through a filing cabinet at the office the other day and found 25 still-in-shrink-wrap hologram-coated Windows ME upgrade disks. Apparently the office had a bunch of Windows 98 computers years ago that included Windows ME upgrades. They (smartly) never installed them.   I think I need to make a light fixture out of them or something, as they sure are shiny (and the holograms add some color to things).  (Or I need to quit working when I'm tired so I don't think of ideas that are stupid like that.)
He's right in a general sense though. Australians do genuinely have no sense of humour. They think they do, but they do not.
Stop downvoting this you fuckin' Nazis.
Maybe. But if it goes up 4.5 feet, they could still hide down there depending on how tall you are. The only safe way is a completely transparent one.
Lost is in the middle ground right now, it could go either way. Either it's magic or some crazy ass sci-fi.
First-person witness.  No photos, I was busy.   
Let me put it this way, do you find it funny watching a old lady fall down a set of stairs?
Went to visit a friend in the dorms. I was underage and had a buddy buy me the best bottle of vodka he could (for 7 dollars). Proceeded to get shitty. Next thing I know I'm in the E.R. and they are asking me for a phone number for someone that can pick me up. Found out later that day that I had been walking around out side in my socks. Then came back into my friend who was a girl dorm room and puked all over their stuff. They finally get me to sleep. A few hours later I wake up and try to use the women bathroom in the dorm. I pass out with my pants around my ankles in a stall and someone finds me and calls an ambulance which brought me to the ER where I woke up. Man did I feel like an ass the next day. Moral of the story is spend more then 7 dollars on a bottle of vodka next time.
This man does not have a lower torso.
cottage cheese, nuts, yogurt
At least he wasn't a proctologist.
Http/1.1 Service Unavailable  Edit: Oh, it's back.
It is.
Aperture is the name of the corporation in the videogame Portal.  I miss my companion cube. Why did GlaDOS insist I incinerate it. Why?!
Well...She DOES live in Japan. =[
The Obama administration (and therefore news media) is simply not using the term "terrorist".  It's not (definitively) because they're domestic.
What's special about Youtube is that they are the default video streaming site that everybody knows. That's it. A month from now, nobody will care that they changed the rating system.
[more racist tea partiers](http://www.weaselzippers.net/blog/2010/03/unreal-wapo-says-tea-partiers-same-people-who-attended-david-duke-rallies-tried-to-lynch-blacks-duri.html)  O'Reilly agreed that both the tea party, and groups supported by Al Sharpton; due to their big tent nature, attract racist elements.  However, I have seen more charactures of Obama as Hitler (complaining and denouncing nazis and racism) than anything else.
Most speed limits are set lower than what is needed because it is assumed people will speed.
same
or perhaps somebody put a strawberry in your tattoo.
I love playing this on my Wii.
Wow, this was neat lol. Made me google my own username to see what came up.
Both: http://berglas.org/Articles/AIKillGrandchildren/AIKillGrandchildren.html
So did she rub his :?
Tell that to the people that have died/ will die because the hospitals are under funded now that the banks are getting saved. 
vim.  * It's everywhere. * It's usable over high-latency connections. * I don't spend all that much time typing, and vim is very efficient at editing in normal mode (no Vulcan nerve pinch chords) * Ergonomics! No finger contortions to press three or four keys at once. * Vimscript is pretty awful, but it's easy enough to shell out to something else to make custom commands.
But at least you can say "this is being turned off because we're legally required to, we're sorry but our hands are tied, and we'll look at figuring out what we can do about this as soon as possible."  Even if that is true, the best you can say is that Sony is utterly useless at customer relations.  There is no evidence of any such legal obligation.
Dude, great work. If I find some time in the next day or two I'll drop your locations in a kml file and share with everyone.
"Hello sir (or madame). Would you like to buy...."
all you'd have to say (or hint) to me is that 'you're not looking for a boyfriend right now but you still wanna have fun'. most of us would take that as the green light to make a move towards the physical side of things, and disregard the emotional until maybe later if things were too good to be true.
i'd put the ads in /r/babies, /r/fatherhood, and /r/mensrights too... justa  suggestion.
man, i am so sick of this whiney ass crap. i'm not even going to respond.   are you really sitting here bitching cuz you can't install linux into your ps3 anymore you dam nerd? go out there and get a life. is this truly where you want to direct your passion and intelligence? you're going to cry because sony took your ability to install linux away from you?  and the worst part? you're going to whine online, and there's not a dam thing you can do about it. you're still going to purchase PS3 games.
http://sarahjessicaparkerlookslikeahorse.com/
People who use KJV, IMO, are usually for some reason trying to obscure the meaning.   Presumably here they chose it as it's recognised to have translational errors that have been corrected/identified in later versions. As you say the NASB is often considered the most literally equivalent English language translation; I find the Amplified Bible to be useful too (hints at the texture of the words used).
You're in for a hell of a time.
It's actually a 6, Pedobear just got really excited and it popped up into a 9...
I see where this is going...
That's the point. Water and hot oil ARE NEVER SAFE, you've just been LUCKY.  Oh fuck it, go throw an icecube in a deep fryer and prove it to us just how safe it is. Be sure to stand within a couple of feet. I've been cooking since I was 4 (yes, I baked my first batch of bread at 5 with my dad, as well) and I'm in my forties as well. I've had years of experience working in restaurant kitchens. You're just flat out wrong, Lefty.
[Appears to be down for everyone](http://downforeveryoneorjustme.com/youtube.com)
I specifically said he was a nice guy.  Is your argument that he shouldn't defend himself when he's clearly in the right?  Not only in the right but has done downright admirable things?  If so I strongly disagree with you.
It's a trick!  Trust everybody!
it's also on vim.org.
Ah, yes. The Jews are always exempt from criticism. Forgot about that universal law.
Lol
I can assure you I have no desire to own a netbook, and never will. My big obnoxious paws don't work at all on their keyboards, and if I'm going to go for something the size of a netbook, I may as well just use my laptop.
Yep, here too. 
A buddy of mine stole another friend's pants...and used those pants as a toilet...
Thank you very much, sir.
I knew there were parallel 5ths in there somewhere. I had fixed a tritone augmented 2nd in that measure, so I think maybe by doing that, I created another problem. And I agree with starting with 2 and 3 part harmony first. Our teacher never went over that with us. She just crams everything in.
At least she isn't doing anything meaningful.
Oooh, do me, do me!
You mean Minefield 3.7b2-20100331a. 
That's a lie. Ever been to Tamworth?
You can always put a tiny sign on your front window just like they do.
No, I know the difference. I just consider tampons infinitely better than both.
And costs four times as much. And has compatibility issues with motion controls and emulating many of the games.   And is of course illegal to do. 
This thread is fucking awesome.  Archive.
Gaming is quickly becoming like Hollywood. 
&gt; That "someone we already know" that is mostly likely to assault us is often the guy we just started dating. 
and where is Walt?
*LIGHTNING STRIKE*
I'm usually pretty good with them, this one just escaped me though
wetness all around me true, but I'm no island... peninsula maybe...
I linked to a study that problematizes the belief that boys are /naturally/ (which is what I meant by 'intrinsically') better at math than girls. It doesn't disprove the belief, you're right, but it certainly brings it into question, which is of value since the finding of the study is that the belief that girls are worse at math then boys is itself a major cause of girls scoring worse at math than boys. I think this is a terrific application of the scientific method, and one with moral significance (in a negative sense, in that it problematizes a source of legitimation for sexism and suggests that certain social assumptions that people make in their interactions should be reevaluated). Anyway, it was a throwaway example on which none of my arguments relied. In two other places I said clearly that science is "great" in certain applications. And I fully believe that. I never suggested, nor do I think any of the above can be reasonably construed as suggesting that "good science does not exist." (edited for clarification... I always apparently see things I want to elaborate on as soon as I hit the "save" button).   Edit: Also... whether or not there is some natural advantage for men at the highest levels of abstract math and physics is still debated (see the Larry Summers controversy), but the history in academia (as in society in general) of institutionalized sexism is pretty uncontroversially accepted as the primary cause underlying the persistent, though gradually eroding disparity. 
You 90% bastard!
But Old Europe and ancient Egypt were goddess worshippers. What changed?
[Centipedes? In my vagina?](http://www.chaischoll.org/plumblog/732.jpg)
* Super C  * Battletanx  * World Driver Championship  * Wayne Gretzky's 3D hockey 98  * G-Police  * RIVER CITY RANSOM BITCHES  * Sky Shark  * Agent Under Fire (Q Claw only multiplayer)
They're most likely in-grown hairs. Avoid shaving against the growth, until you've at least made one or two passes with it, then a last one against it for smoothness. Facial scrubs definitely help.
That's more or less what I came up with.  I suppose perch isn't terribly exotic, but it doesn't have to be exotic to be delicious!  Thanks!
I disagree, I loved the gambit system.
&gt; True, as every other member did. As it stands, Germany is the only  &gt; country close to the 3% budget deficit,  When I say Greece fudged its figures, I mean that they *misrepresented* their figures. Other countries may have had some constraints waived, but Greece outright *lied* about what their figures were.  &gt; European economics (and politics) cannot be easily perceived from a  &gt; non European point of view.  Who's perceiving what from a non-European point of view, now?  The original article talked about "workers ... sending a message that they won't pay for the crisis." If not Greek workers, then who? The money to pay for Greece's profligacy is ultimately going to have to come from Greece. And Greek workers are going to have to pay for it by retiring later, for one thing.
Do you make physics based jokes/sexy quibs while having sex or flirting?
wouldnt it get difficult to keep holding his legs up? or would he rest them on my shoulders? how many times would you guess hed need to bottom before it doesnt hurt/feels good?
some of them are also stupid
I need about 1000 to 1500 seedling trees to plant on 7 acres. Do you think they would give me a few extra?
I think you mean Descent2 soundtrack.  Descent1 was entirely MIDI music, however the playstation version of D1 also had a remastered version in redbook that is quite good. 
Mental health therapist and social worker. I'm out at work which happened slowly, I never said it but would slip in comments here and there about my gf. I'm not sure if everyone knows, but my department does. It hasn't impacted my job at all. 
This is what I do for a living, without all the alcohol and damage.  
And rightly so.  Its almost as bad as waking the baby.
I think that the book serves as a good wake-up call about how civilization as we know it cannot sustain itself forever.  If you already realize this, then it is not of much value to you.  Of course, one should go from Ishmael to exploring real-world topics that have been scientifically studied, like overpopulation or uses of energy.
First off, the conclusion of this study is way too vague. How far nature has fallen. All of the subjects were women yet the authors extend their results to everyone. Secondly, the exact same game with testosterone administration was done in men and showed the exact opposite result, http://www.plosone.org/article/info:doi/10.1371/journal.pone.0008330  and the Zurich authors apparently didn't stumble upon this paper as its not in the references.  Perhaps there is an opposite in men and women, but to claim that this study refutes folk ideas of testosterone is preposterous as only women were used. I guess to get into Nature nowadays you need to sacrifice science for a good headline. 
I'll just leave this referral code here: d8354f18ffae738cc8db4f5933146bf2213d81a9
If there were no smiley faces, and you didn't take such care with the quotes and the spacing, I would say you were my boyfriend. 
...*What* is it that you guys do in the reddit office, again?
The owner is female, so the correct phrasing is:  "I can't schlick to this,"
bad. 
plasticcow didn't cite a reference, but from what I've seen that number probably includes all types of sexual assault, not just rape-with-penetration.   The vast majority of city-residing Japanese women have been groped on the train (no, that's not an exaggeration). Very, very few of them ever report it, although that is changing now.  Another type of abuse usually classified as sexual assault by these statistics is sexual harassment, which is pretty much institutionalized here in Japan -- although that, too, is starting to change.
Point taken. I just wanted an excuse to look it up again.
Find an excessively large dildo.  Again, spandex is a must.  You know what to do.
This last Sunday I was in my neighborhood Trader Joe's when I turned the corner of an aisle and nearly walked right into Perry Farrell. He was shopping in the West LA TJ's on Pico with his wife and two sons. It was the oddest thing. To me this guy has been larger than life, but here he was out being nothing more than a husband and dad. I've been a fan of JA since their early days and have seen them in concert 5 times including the first Lollapalooza. I very much wanted to approach him and sincerely thank him for his artistic efforts. What stopped me was that he and his wife were clearly having a "domestic moment". I shopped around for 15 minutes trying to find an opening for a non-awkward approach. Long story short Perry never let up with the bitching... it was non-stop. Trust me, I respect Perry for all that he has created as a musician, artist, and business man. But in just 15 minutes I could see what a difficult person he could be to work with. It explained an awful lot. 
or muscle memory hero to rule them all
&gt;No one really believes the CPI.. Do they? How to hide inflation and debt were the intro topics of my first Political Economy class.  And there you have the answer (it's what's called an "open secret" -- a lie that people in official positions publicly believe and endorse, but which they privately know is utter BS). 
Doritos.
Seriously, fuck graphics, fuck it and leave in the the fucking gutter to fucking die. DaoC graphics is more than enough for me in an MORPG, it's only the gameplay that matters, fucking pavlovian gamers salivating over every fucking bloomed and bump-mapped pixel, fuck.
FF13 is the first FF I've enjoyed playing since 6. Maybe I've mellowed out over the years. I'm lucky if I get 5 hours a week to play games these days, so that probably contributes to it as well - I don't really want to power game.  So I've put around 20 hours into it so far. The visuals are wonderful. And the saving grace, gameplay wise, is the battle system.  FF has always been mostly linear, so I don't get that particular gripe. If you want non-linearity, play Fallout 3, etc. It's difficult to put together a long narrative without linearity. And just like the other FFs, you can dick around at the end doing whatever you want.
We didn't deserve it anyway.
man, he was reeeally counting on a different camera angle for those 2 seconds. =)
Did you even bother reading the rest of the thread before posting? &gt;Violence against a person is already illegal The whole point you're missing is that hate crimes in their execution threaten an entire group of people, not just the individual victim.
This guy [Jesse Bishop did his own version](http://www.concatenationrecords.com/ccn014.html) and it too is way better than the new remake. 
The great thing is that they really were 2 completely different games, so it's difficult to compare them.
Get the free schooling. Go where you have the best scholarship offer (as long as its a pretty good school). There is nothing wrong with junior college. Your first two years are just the basic classes anyway.
That's better than being mauled by a bear or having your toyota careen out of control and off a cliff.
Machinarium Samorost 2
ok im retarded. how the hell do you link to a specific spot in a youtube video?
&gt; It pains me that there are many many cool Aussies, but we are let down by bogans and westies. The average person in any country is a bit of a dickhead.
and we have a winner
Not to be a linux douche, but I got Ubuntu about a month ago and it is the greatest thing that has ever happened to me. No complaints at all, and bunch of cool apps to use. I do not play any games though, so that helps.
Ha, maybe that's what the op is referring to.
NO FUCKING SHIT. Bush started wars which actually.... dun dun dunnnnn CREATED a shitload of terrorists. Bush went where he shouldn't have and Obama gets left with the resulting mess and blowback and you think Obama is the bad president we should be talking about?
"Your a wolf in sheeps clothing" YOU'RE!
Have you played the original Gold and Silver versions?  If so, you're in for a trip of nostalgia. There's an item in the game that lets you replace all the sounds with the original 8-bit tunes.
There, there.
You're a disgrace to your username.
Dude, why would you put a dead cat's head down your shirt to make your boobs look bigger? they're already massive.
Haha, no actually the soundtrack is 5 cds. Soooo, you fail.
I wasn't even going to go in, but in reality I have been thinking about getting a new road bike for the last few years and this is a bike shop I haven't been to in a while.  I was thinking about getting a Surly Pacer, but with the parts group of the Jamis, I can't see getting the Surly over the Jamis.   
This thread is worthless without pics.
Cue ipad argument
It runs on electrolytes!
I will be going to UMASS Amherst next year.
Do you deal with anything mass related to the universe? What do you feel explains the the missing "stuff" that exerts its influence on everything out there is? Dark matter? the multi-verse theory? calabi-yau shapes?
Chili.
I hate you. You put them back right this minute! &gt;=[
From the article:  &gt; The company is taking its message to Congress. Oil and gas sector lobbying has more than tripled since 2004, reaching $168.3 million last year, according to the Center for Responsive Politics. Koch spent $12.3 million on lobbyists in 2009, ranking it fifth behind Exxon, Chevron Corp., ConocoPhillips Co. and BP PLC.  &gt; Environmentalists, meanwhile, have increased their lobbying expenditures fourfold during that same period, spending $22.5 million last year. **Greenpeace spent $46,291 on lobbyists in 2009, according to the Center for Responsive Politics.**  If you want to include Greenpeace's campaign expenditure, we should probably also look at the amount spent on advertising by oil companies.
Most people seem to think that the Cowboys denying shopping Marion Barber means they are shopping him around.  I think they probably are shopping him because they have two other proven running backs and Barber has been showing signs of injury.
I have a sick feeling the mage is probably using rank 1 of every spell. Download the add-on rankwatch and it will tell you, (and whisper them a block of text) if they are using down ranked spells. Especially now with dual specs I've seen a lot of people, including myself, with down ranked spells.
In fairness to the bishop, they *were* very bad children.
I'd agree with that. It would beggar the imagination for an oil company to fund legitimate research about climate change- unless of course they covered up the results afterwards. This has certainly happened with pharmaceuticals.
It wouldn't of mattered I had a friend's birthday party to attend, so no worries I'll just make up for it by being extra ridiculous at the next one ;)
There was such satisfaction in seeing all that green, even if it was earned mostly by the forklift and not me.  Plus, if you wanted some cash, all you had to do is fly around a little and collect your pay.
If the subs are silent they should just say that they have them deployed, and not actually do it.  
zomg this one. $20 if you can send me a higher quality mp3. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=A09D_JtubBw#t=1m00s
interesting. yes, i need to like myself before anyone else can. this i know.  i just guess i have to wait and not keep looking, let it happen. all the old adages, i guess i should follow them eh?
that song is what ails me.
And we're back in business with a lovely April Fools joke.
Both are carbon atoms arraigned differently, `MadScientist420`.
MOUNTAIN BLADE!!!!
http://www.filleritem.com  EDIT: sorry, probably useless
This is bullshit, I came here expecting salsa, and there were just WORDS!
The carrots are all in the wrong place.
Congrats!! Stick with it!
Things like this really make me question if it's true that all ideas are worth considering or respecting.
I remember you telling us about that a couple months ago. I don't remember the tiny sex part but it was funny.
Yes, I agree with you. Nevertheless, using the adjective "groundbreaking" in relation to F# is unfortunate: it is really that which I was commenting on.
like when I was endlessly bending / straitening vga cable pins to finally figure-out it was broken inside just next to the connector.   pro tip : try not bending cable 90deg over very short length
[Video Not Found](http://imgur.com/Zd3zH.png)
We don't get any commissions. At all. Period. And we never have. If you got bad advice, which is unfortunately unavoidable if you spend enough time in the store, it certainly wasn't to make more money. The sales metrics are so fucking complex that most employees couldn't explain to you what their own department's growth plan is, much less a single store's. So they're sure as hell not going to know what to sell metric-fucking-tonnes of to try and get a $0.15 raise in a year. There's so much valid shit to talk, but you just make shit up. Why?   Also, there MIGHT be one vendor rep in a store at a time, excluding the larger stores that have a clearly labeled Apple employee working at the Apple table. Again, you could have just stuck to the valid point, but you just made shit up. Don't be willfully ignorant. It's offensive.
First the whole I don't want to risk losing a friendship excuse is lame unless they're a best friend and you KNOW they don't have any interest you. Once you realize you're going to take it to the next step it's important to do it subtly. Do things that leave her questioning whether the relationship is more but don't straight out say it. Increase touch, sexual innuendos, and flirting. Going to a club or bar where alcohol is involved might help ease the tension slightly as well. 
This reminds me of an article by the guardian: [picture](http://64digits.com/users/marbs/ThatCernThingExplained.jpg)  (I knew it was worth taking a photo of that article 1 year 6 months and 21 days ago)
Hurt by Trent is far less awesome to Johnny Cash's cover, even admitted so by Trent himself. 
1. I was going to ask this same question today. 2. Unless you are on the East Coast of the U.S. you probably haven't heard of it, but it's called [Charleston Chew](http://1.bp.blogspot.com/_dnmPzxbBNyU/SIwCHzSDeDI/AAAAAAAABco/5jZZ3Z2c4bo/s320/charleston+chew.jpg) --&gt; Throw 'em in the freezer, they are delicious! 
Every time Gabe is picked out of a line up its another month.
I never hear anyone talk about star siege tribes any more...
Google "look of disapproval" Copy   Paste
&gt;I am going to be an asshole and say, who cares? What is the question of sustaining the life of a person where their brain does not function.  I agree, and that's the issue. But it's not as simple as that because the definition of death that is currently used is "brain" death, which is not the same as a persistent vegetative state that has CNS function and a small, very small, possibility of allowing the individual to function in society again at some point. Right now in most states, if there is no living will, the preferences of the family might not be enough to get the hospital to take off the respirator (see Missouri v Cruzan).  Brain death is tricky because it involves all functions of the brain, so even if your brain is still secreting hormones and causing involuntary twitches, your brain is alive when there may be no hope of restoring consciousness. This is where the slippery slope argument comes in, but that's another, longer issue in itself... 
I was a long time lurker, there are prolly tons of em
Read it again...the horse is now diamonds
I am pretty photogenic so I really cannot compete.
Depends on what you mean by "love".  I seem to be the only one on Reddit who likes some Shaun White Snowboarding from time to time.  
Canadian here, still march 31st.
Good to know.
At first I thought this might be my friend, but then I realized he'll probably never toke. But you are, of course, a friend.
I'm gonna say this character is modeled after The Office &amp; MacGruber.
I'd love to see those pictures, if you don't mind. That sounds pretty awesome.
I hate when a movie was only good because I was an excited kid.  I'm hoping that it's not this way for you.
I was raised in a fundamentalist Baptist church in the south. I remember one time my father caught me smoking when I was 13 years old and his idea of a fair punishment was to get a hickory stick about the thickness of of your thumb and beat me with it in front of my mother and my sisters. Later I had to stand naked in front of my mother while she pulled the splinters out. Then I had to explain to the gym teacher at the "Christian" school I attended that I didn't want to dress out (shorts and t-shirt) because I was embarrasses from the whelps on my body. The teacher of course did nothing because Dad was just following God's will to beat his children.  I didn't love my father again until I was 30 and finally called him on it and told him I was going to kick his ass. He begged my forgiveness and we cried and we healed our relationship and were close until his death.  I am so much happier as an atheist (from age 16) and really detest what otherwise seemingly rational people do in the name of religion and God.
University of Maryland Baltimore County. I feel so alone!
Conan Obrien. Game over
Yeah, it's like people don't even know about www.reddit.com/r/google_maps_views_of_large_pliers_in_the_sky. Old hat for some of us.
Fantastic documentary.
When has israel ever given a shit about it's allies. The do what they want, take what they want, and give anyone who criticizes them the finger. They need to be held to account for their illegal and immoral acts. I fully expect to be downvoted by the sock puppets who troll reddit in the pay or israel, but that doesn't make what I'm saying any less true.
As someone who doesn't personally use youtube except when I am referred to it (I don't upload or comment or anything), I don't like it one bit. The set was simple and worked before. I know more features or whatever is cool and all, but I feel lost again because I'm not there often. I just don't feel comfortable, I guess.
Castro was high up there.
TextMate handles this by knowing that languages can embed other languages. Every character in the file has multiple 'scopes' which define the relevant syntax.
It still works on FF 3.6 :D
My experience with people who say the "let's take this offline" is that they don't want other people to hear the answer - and so everyone gets a different answer. Or sometimes the answer is embarassing and the person getting grilled does not want to admit their fuckups in public.
Still marginally better than Tony Abbott, though. Imagine what an Aussie PM in speedos could do for the world's comedians...
&gt;Great, but you're not him.  Dude, I'm not the person who posted his life story and REQUESTED feedback. I'm the guy providing feedback by REQUEST. That you don't like my feedback, well, la-dee-fucking-dah. I'm entitled to my opinion.   The father is indirectly telling his kid to fuck off, and that means his father is a negative influence in his life. The kid isn't really a kid. He's a young adult and he tells us he can get by on his own for the three months. I say he should use the experience of having a shitty parent to his advantage -- take control of his life by getting the fuck out and providing for himself. No looking back.  The only question is how the son should handle his father years from now when the father is wracked with guilt at being such an asshole. That's assuming the father is still human enough to feel remorse.
morality is relative. other cultures feel the same way about things we do.  not saying i feel its right, cuz i dont. its just that there is no universal code of ethics. kind of ironic tho that in this age of technology, they decide to grab an axe and OFF WITH HIS HEAD!! i wonder if alice in wonderland was just released there
anyone else getting tired of the blaming everyone ELSE for the economy's problems.  We can all agree on banks...as for unions, gov employees or car makers...its getting a little tiring.  Guess what?  YOU make too much money too.  Why don't YOU take a paycut...after all, we all need to contribute today?  &lt;crickets&gt;  didn't think so...  I hate hypocrits....
Give him da clamps! 
[Descent I &amp; II](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u8DLqSday44) also [Stellar 7](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BFlXU-1T5m0&amp;feature=related)
What does their visiting places where people are coerced and tortured for their ammusement have to do with politics? What does character have to do with politics?
Toca Rivera.
This thread title might be the funniest fucking thing I've heard all week.   Jesus, too funny. 
Otherwise known as 'Paris Hilton's new sex tape'
yeah, also who the hell names themselves "concernedbtuser" this isn't an "Ask Susan" newspaper column.
lots of white space, very clean
Is that true that its the first criminal trial without a jury in four hundred years what about the trials of IRA suspects in the 70's and 80's they were never heard with a jury??
This story is very WTF
Isn't it illegal to own content that displays sexual violence against women illegal in the UK? 
Care-O-Meter  |-|----------|
When I need to get directly to something I just cut through the departments. There's always an alternate route out of each area that gives you a shortcut.
I feel the same way.  I wasn't really ever bored while playing, and I found the way they introduced the RPG tropes (like leveling) within a narrative context was really well done.  It seemed methodical and calculated to me, rather than plodding.
BAAA DAT DAT DAT BAAAA DAT DAT DAT
I'm in H! REVEAL YOURSELF.
Went with my gut on what sounded good.
&gt; Many of the acupuncturists at my school have SEVERAL great magic apps that we use in the clinic while interviewing/scamming chumps.  FTFY.
You don't give birth alone even though in the end, it just come down to you and the baby. :) I've never been to counseling, but I think involving a professional before bailing would be a good idea.  If you weren't married yet I would advise against this guy.  But since you are already married and he seems like he is trying to improve (but just doesn't know/have a role model) give it a chance but not forever :)  I get the impression if this guy could improve you'd have a great 30+ years ahead.  But... you have been married from 22-25, and had a single boyfriend from 20-22.  Have you dated much before 20?  I get the undercurrent that you need more dating/life experiences before you really settle down...
Worst FF ever!
Why not 12ft amazons?  Death by snu-snu!
[Gemcraft: Chapter Zero](http://armorgames.com/play/3527/gemcraft-chapter-0)  ... the-just-one-more-stage syndrome
To train you to defeat her later so that she could escape her physical confines and kick copious amounts of ass in Portal 2.
I have a peugeot from the late 70's I'm looking to sell.  I think it might be an A018, but I'm not sure.  See: [http://imgur.com/riZrC.jpg](http://imgur.com/riZrC.jpg) for a mid-rebuild pic.   ------ EDIT: The frame is in near pristine condition, and I stripped everything down, replaced the bearings, cleaned and greased everything that I could clean and/or grease, and started building it back up with the original hardware.  I intended to make it a fixie, but after riding it a few times I came to the sad, sad conclusion that the frame is just slightly too small for me.  
Ahem.....
Where you watching the same game as me? There's not a snowballs chance in hell that was a foul.
As long as its not too loud...you might run the risk of disrupting their protest.
Great site..
hear hear! Now if you'll excuse me, I have a clandestine meeting in a railcar to attend.
Woah no need to resort to ugly stereotypes. For reference: go [here](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QTj47rcuM-4)
Taken today(:
exactly
Great this helps a lot!
this immediately reminded me about The Worst Band in the Universe and star wars.
Here is his [wingman](http://imgur.com/xZ6bW.jpg)
Gonna go starve myself now.
Good blog. I think I have to get me one of those spew shirts.
A distinct possibility.
World opinion isn't Israel's primary concern. The state of Israel is Israel's primary concern.
I shot a man in Reno.
The tops of various granite stacks, particularly mid ocean ones.    There's bound to be a few of those left in the world - not many, but a few.
Is the faggot on the right wearing a reddit pendant???
This article simply tries to pull a ["poisoning the well"](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poisoning_the_well) fallacy.
HoN sure is pretty, but I'll take League of Legends over it any day.  Even if I have to wait another year for all the competitive crunchy bits HoN has.
Wait, are you kidding?  I hope so...
I think places with state holiday on that day should complain about the name.
Well then if you don't execute your witches then what do you do with them? Answer me that, Mr. Smartypants.
You bring up an interesting point about minorities, thought crimes, and symbolism. I wonder if a Jew is allowed to wear a Swastika in Germany.
I am getting that you don't like MMORPG's. News flash, some people (millions of people actually) like MMO's.
http://www.reddit.com/r/self  All about self posts, about yourself.
I do not like the new interface anyways.
It's possible he meant that if you were to go to Alabama you would realise a mixture of people (rednecks and otherwise) live there, implying it is the same in Australia. I must admit that's not how I read it as first though ;p
Eh, some people want that kind of life.  I actually can't stand to be close to most people, and usually a boyfriend is just the only person I can be around for an extended period of time without wanting to slit my wrists in frustration.
The question is, who wants 90% of a diaper?
&gt;Tim Davenport, 42, of Kansas City, Mo., was recently stopped on 15th Street in Blue Springs, Mo., and ticketed for going 40 mph in a 35-mph zone — although the police officer initially ticketed him for 40 in a 25, he says. "I drove down that road again, and the posted limit was 35," he says. "I figured the judge wouldn't accept that, since I was over the speed limit, and would still charge me with it. So I went ahead and paid" the $60 ticket. Doh!  That is *exactly* how judges let you off tickets.  All you have to do is disprove one major point on the report and you get off.  If the cop doesn't get the speed limit right how the hell can he claim he knew how fast you were going?  It destroys their credibility.  You will get off if they make this type of error 99% of the time.  
And I know why!
[Radiata Stories](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Radiata_Stories)
i mean i wear my seatbelt not because it's the law, but because i'm not an idiot. i can't think of any good reason not to wear your seatbelt, other than lookin real cool maaaaaan. and this whole 'only endangering others when youre drunk', every time you get in a car you endanger other people, probably not on purpose, but thats why they are called 'accidents'. not "yeah i meant to fuckin hit you"
Sean Hannity has been dead for 10 years.  When are we going to exhume his corpse and waterboard it?
upvoted for song and hot chic...
Hrm. They claim the yellowing issue has been fixed. Make sure the display is calibrated. 
A free society lets each person live how they want. There is nothing stopping someone from joining a VOLUNTARY commune in a free society. Instead, the leftists want to FORCE every one into a giant commune.
nice, like you said charming   Reminds me of hanging out with my siblings, thought you don't want to hear us sing.
...and yes, I know it's terrible photoshopping :P
Yes, that was a great game.  What I don't understand is, why can't they repeat this?   Technologically, we're far ahead of where we were when this game came out, so how come they can't seem to make a fun Jedi FPS game anymore? (And don't say Force Unleashed.  That had a really cool story, but the gameplay was weak, especially on the PC.)
I'd actually say this guy makes more sense than Bush.
Yes but ganga gives me terrible side effects.  It's not worth it for me.  
All science inherently has the practical application of disproving god just a little bit more. Even hardon science. [semi-pun thoroughly intended]  -ouch, at least i know what it feels like now to be this low in the negatives..however, my comment stands, it still makes me smile upon rereading.   you jerks.
Exactly what I was thinking too, what did that?
Where is it warm enough to have daiquiris by the pool in March? I want to know so I can move there.  I'm drinking to stay warm.
Not that up on old Europe but wasn't the main God Ra a male? In Egypt?
They are sweet enough already. I want a tomato, not candy.
It was The Stig's birthday present a few years ago. They only showed the outside views on tv tho.
You're not on Atheist subreddit anymore.
I know what you mean. I also like to look at other people's boobs, simply because I don't have any to admire myself. :(
Advice: She is not in the game :(
I think us Australians have a pretty good sense of humour actually. Pity about the Prime Minister FUUUUUUU
Just because someone is driving the speed limit, doesn't mean they are doing so in the *passing* lane.  It is not the "fast" lane, but the "passing" lane. It should be used as such.  I'm glad I make self important people mad :P
www.girl-on-midgets-on-donkeys.com
You must construct additional pylons!
Unfortunately, 39 in 40 believe *they* are that "supertasker".
I've had good experience with Bluehost.  Clients of mine have used GoDaddy before, but I'll never use them again because of their shitty interface and obnoxious website.
I would say it's Warner Brothers making separate deals with different companies.  I would say Blockbuster favors new releases for its stores, and Netflix wants to increase its watch now titles.  Since Blockbuster is on life support, I would say the Netflix agreement is a bigger deal.  Unfortunately, now I have to add another 28 days to what is a long wait for new releases from Netflix as it is.
If people shout at you that you are a baby murderer, that is not endorsing violence.  If people send you threatening envelopes containing unidentified white powders, that's not endorsing violence.  If people throw a brick through your window and then leave messages on your answering machine about snipers, that's not endorsing violence.  If people send you threatening letters and the same day cut your gas lines, that's not endorsing violence.  "If Brown can't stop it, a Browning can" is not endorsing violence. "It is apparent that it will take a few assassinations to stop Obamacare. Militia central has selected you for assassination. If we cannot stalk and find you in Washington, D.C., we will get you in Little Rock." - that's not endorsing violence either.  Ramming someone's car because they have an Obama bumper sticker isn't endorsing violence.  Nor will anyone resort to violence simply because they believe the President is not American, a Muslim and a fascist communist tyrant who  wants to destroy the country, is raping lady liberty and wiping with the constitution as he builds up a corps of black stormtroopers and brainwashes the kids. That wouldn't inspire a violent reaction from anybody.  But none of that has ANYTHING to do with the tea party. The following quotes are just from random wingnuts, not anybody who has power or the ear of the movement:  "I want people in Minnesota armed and dangerous….having a revolution every now and then is a good thing." (Bachmann)  "If I could start a country with a bunch of people it would be the folks standing out here the last few days. Let’s hope we don’t have to do that. Let’s beat that other side to a pulp. Let’s take them out, let’s chase them down..." (King)  "Thomas Jefferson said the Tree of Liberty will be fed by the blood of tyrants and patriots. You are the modern day patriots." (McCaul)  Remember, though, that even if anybody did (hypothetically) do something, it would be justified - as Newt Gingrich informs us, the democrats "Have To Take Some Moral Responsibility." It's the victim's fault.
And who do you think that guy was? Emilio Estevez.
In a low percentage of cases nipples become less sensitive. Most women experience some numbness, but after a few months and sometimes even a year it comes back.  Back problems are an entirely different story. As long as you don't go too big you're not going to have back problems.
Just because someone is driving the speed limit, doesn't mean they are doing so in the *passing* lane.  It is not the "fast" lane, but the "passing" lane. It should be used as such.  I'm glad I make self important people mad :P
[Predator](http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0093773/)
And the other 39 are sure to kill someone.
Big props to O'Reilly.  I can't stand him otherwise or fox, but when someone does something so positive they deserve recognition for it.  Good on you Mr. O'Reilly, keep up the good work.  That's your test.
Source? Sounds too good for me to not know the context.
Your speakers are unshielded and your phone powering up to talk to the nearest cell tower creates a source of signal very close to your speakers. 
Now now, let's not get hasty. We can't be sure about that.  It _could_ lead to candy.
you can't hear text
I ran my own company once. Found out I didn't like it. Being the janitor/accounting/marketing/HR/PR guy in addition to what I actually wanted created the corporation to do was a big turn off.
&gt;I will stop feeding them my money and my mile high stack of games will remain at a mile high.  So... they've already won?
9/11 truth ends the war!
Hey, it worked! Though I didn't create or save a bat file. I just ran a.exe.  Could you share your X-Com build? Maybe others will use it too.   Capital salutations!
Right, but paying a handful of CEOs and Execs hundreds of millions, if not billions, in salary, stocks, and benefits is fine compared to hiring qualified workers (who have raised productivity ridiculously over the last 40 years) and paying fair wages and benefits.
No, but he grabbed her ~s
I hate Overgrown even more than I do derail. It's horrid. And then the fact that I always get stuck playing it on Sabotage or Headquarters makes it that much worse. 
When they say it's okay.  My husband is my best friend's ex from high school.
&gt; Because many of the studies are privately-funded, there is no obligation for total data transparency  Wait, wat? Did I just hear someone touting 'data transparency' in the AGW camp? Pot, meet Kettle.  &gt; Because of the poilitcal and economic importance of the science, environmental studies have to be held to the high standard that the best medicine studies are  Indeed, words to live by...  &gt; It is worth bearing in mind that Greenpeace is a charity that doesn't exist to maximize profit and benefit the individuals that head it; unlike businesses  However, *just like business* it exists to ensure that it continues existing, which includes jobs for the high ups that run it.
...he asked us if he should do it though..
mmm Jason's Deli. All the free ice cream you can eat
LOL
Burgers can be healthy food too. Grind your own meat or buy from a butcher, but make sure it's lean meat. Buy darker bread without all the sugar in it - hamburger bread is like 50% sugar. Use lots of lettuce and onions and veggies, and maybe some balsamico dressing, again something low-fat. 
I wonder how I can crowbar in the word "nigger"... 
My brother will be going there next year. You may meet him; he'll be the guy that always *looks* stoned even though he actually doesn't smoke that often.
better than showing them his cock...
I'd think the fox urine would be worth a try.  https://www.amazon.com/dp/B00025H3DA?tag=zirkelcom-20&amp;camp=213381&amp;creative=390973&amp;linkCode=as4&amp;creativeASIN=B00025H3DA&amp;adid=0VGZAZZDWN2R87V651CD&amp;
I'll leave when I'm good and ready
My co-worker and I have been using redditor for a short while (myself) and a long while (him). We sit directly behind each other with our backs facing. He's 5 feet away from me and we both surf the internet / reddit all the time when it's slow.  I didn't know he was a redditor till last week. Fucker alt-tabs at the speed of light
Lol, good point. I'll blame that on talking about the 'politics' and specific seedy practices of some forms of Christianity; even as an atheist, I can usually conduct myself better than I did talking with you. I'll definitely use this experience as a reminder to keep the temper in check.  Thank you so for for the link, as well! That doesn't look like any organization I remember hearing about, but the fact that you have to pass that in for your contribution to be agreed with by the heads of that church proves that it is still going on even now. From what I have gathered, it used to be much more common with certain flavors of Christians and Mormons in years past; it looks like either the reports I remember hearing about, or cries from their congregations halted the practice in a lot of places. It looks like social control is used more now as opposed to tax records (Mormons will even stop you from attending a family wedding if you 'owe' them money), but they effectively lead to the same place.  Thanks again, I'm going to look more into the group from your link and see what I can find. 
13k ha.
It would probably be worth looking at the receipt and papers that came with the couch, to see if the fabric was covered under warranty. If not, perhaps you can go to the local college/university/trade school  textile or design department. You could probably post a notice that you'd like someone to refurbish your couch if you'll buy the material. I'm sure plenty of students would have the opportunity to use that as a school project and they would do it for free. The cost of the fabric could cost you $30-$100 depending on what you want, and you'd get to pick exactly what you want. There are plenty of upholstery warehouses that have great quality fabric for cheap. Hope you find a good, cheap solution for your couch woes! p.s. or you could post on craigslist for the student option, I'm sure you'd get a few replies.
Yeah I definitely still eat them all the time.
ಠ_ಠ
Meh. All those fat corncobs lying around going to waste. And they're carefully posed to hide what we really want to see.  Oh well, Rule 34 never said anything about the porn being hot.
My grandfather was a non-religious man, though if you asked him, I suspect he would have said that he believed in God, as that's what respectable people of his generation did. But he never went to church, had no religious paraphernalia in his home, and looked askance at expressions of religious devotion (to a secular Canadian, it's like expressions of patriotism: it just seems crass).   At his funeral, the pastor (regardless of a man's life, there are some defaults it's difficult to avoid) recited what he called my grandfather's "favourite hymn," "How Great Thou Art," and spoke of it as illustrative of my grandfather's piety and devotion.  I was indignantly steaming: the man's name was Art, he was a perennial kidder, and he liked the hymn because it seemed to say that he was great.   I still feel indignant about the way the pastor misrepresented my grandfather for his own agenda.
A young Justin Timberlake.
I have to disagree.  there's no way executive's would kill their companies customers... and there's certainly no way the 'plebs' at consumer product companies would knowingly harm people.  Let alone the genius in R&amp;D knowingly do this.  so who is behind this?  I think the auto-manufacturers are a perfect example.  no one wants a front page story about accelerator problems as it will effect their brand, thus sales, thus the stockholders.  almost all of these stories is fear mongering and conspiracy in nature.   Edit: downvotes?  really?  It's like saying the 'world' is trying to kill you.  It's not, I work in the trade and it's all B.S.  consider me a soapier on steroids... it's just so false it pisses me off.
FIRE UP THE GRILL!
This is an amazing post.
There are things that must be said while caffeine runs through my head  With the people who are still employed
Wave Race 64.  I was beast at that game.
Thank you for taking 38 seconds of my life before i realized your full of shit.
Strange... Possibly UK only?
I had to do all these chores for free and was mostly told no whenever I wanted things.  I did have nice some nice christmas' though.
university of colorado boulder next year man. Gunna be some epic stoners chillin there
[Secret Weapons of the Luftwaffe](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Secret_Weapons_of_the_Luftwaffe).  The best WW2 flight sim available at the time of its release, with a dynamic campaign mode that is *still* better than the campaign modes on most current sims.
As the dude who broke and subsequently fixed that mug, let me just say that the camera adds 10 lbs. ...and subtracts 4 inches...
I am in full agreement but what worries me is exactly what you've said. Dems have done a horrible job in damage control and they need to tow along 'everyone else'. It's never about the truth it's about who sells it better.  Losing a few seats is expected but what makes me feel worse is that be succeeding in voting dems out it will reinforce the idea that their brand of 'truth' is correct and make that slide a little steeper. 
https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTU3NjI3MTg5 Will donate a what.cd invite to the person that gets me to 10G!
That. 
I figured it wouldn't hurt to ask.
They probably were overwhelmed by the amount of complaining of the new layout!
He claimed to have "been all over". I actually have lived and visited quite a few locales and for every oddity he mentioned I could think of another place with it.  &gt; That's just like, your opinion man.  There haven't been race riots in the US in at least 20 years. They happened in the past couple years in paris. Most every continental european I've met has crazy stereotypes about every other type of european, and any other country/ethnic group. I have lived and still work internationally, this isn't anecdata. They're not quite as bad as say, the japanese.
i live in a pretty sketchy hood (constant sirens and cruisers everywhere, possibly due to gun shots, drug peddling, etc... a cop got beaten to within an inch of his life just down the street from my apartment last year :S). as a small, young, white female, i try to be wary of strangers late at night in the park. last night i got off the bus along with a 25ish-looking, slightly G'd up black man.  who greeted me with a warm smile, then introduced himself (seeming just plain and genuinely CHEERFUL the whole time). shook my hand. ("you live around here?" "yeh." "cool. maybe see you around sometime") told me to have a good night and walked off. no hint of creepiness. no hint of flirtation. no danger. not what i was getting ready to run away from in a desperate panic. just plain cheerfulness. i guess he'd just had a good day or something. 
Well, there's the line between being creepy and having mystique.  If your buddy drove a corvette and you asked to borrow it for the night, hoping to "be like him" it wouldn't work either - you'd awkwardly lean up against it trying to look cool and hope someone notices, which would look completely fake, where he would just drive his car like it was no big deal and not care if anyone notices. You can always work on improving yourself, but you're not going to find a magic set of rules to imitate, especially if you keep being down on yourself for not getting as many girls as your buddy or something.  Here's a starter - next time you see a girl you think is cute, walk up and say "Hey, can I ask you a quick question?  Where's a good place around here to have lunch?"  You don't need to marry this girl after you ask her, it just gets you more comfortable with having a casual conversation that can go in whatever direction you want.
While doing my teacher-education program in order to get my credential, we had a series of debates on this issue.  Most people's answer (these are the future teachers of America) was: "Let them read what they want so long as they're reading." It was face-palm for me every day of class for me.  I'm a bit of a traditionalist.  Yes, I want them to read, but I want them to GAIN something from their reading as well, so I don't want to just let them read whatever they want and say that's okay, especially when these kids today have been exposed to SO much media, that most of them can't effectively navigate it.  When I was in school, we were taught not only the classics, but how to deal with media bias and literacy.  We, on a whole (at least as I've observed and experienced) don't do that today - we ignore the media and say that the kids are so exposed to it throughout their lives now that they're better acquainted with it than we are, which I think is a bad way of looking at it.
I feel like you missed out. The last half of Palumpolum is where the game starts going, "Okay, you know the basics, now here are some mook teams that will kick your ass if you don't pay attention." The challenge kept me going until the story picked up again.
It all depends on context and your own physiology.  Generally, it would be better to eat a lot of sugar (read: not fructose) at once.  The Insulin spike that accompanies it would make metabolic changes to either use the sugar or reduce the bad effects of excess, but has other effects which aren't the best for overall health (like stopping the usage of fat for fuel, me no likey). Prolonging this exposure to Insulin over the course of the day would be the greater of two evils.  However, with the lesser of two evils, reactive hypoglycemia is still a concern.   And yes, Insulin before sleep is horrible. Sugars themselves aren't, but they are almost always followed by Insulin, which impairs many of the effects of GH, spiked highly during sleep.
Use the jet engine to push the earth away from the sun a little bit, thus solving the global warming issue. Yes, I went to a public school, why do you ask?
Arrrgh. All this implementation-specific talk and cavalier treatment of terms. Per the standard, dereferencing NULL is undefined behaviour (not a crash), pointers are not actually integers, and a NULL pointer does not necessarily have all zero bits (assigning from/comparing to 0 is a special case, and it doesn't work with other integer values).  At least in C++, anyway.
Star Ocean 2 for the PSX, It got me into rpgs for 4 years or so.
What I found was that it didn't so much improve my *playing* (at least, from a technical standpoint), but it did help me to notice interesting sounds as I was dicking around, and before I knew it, I'd have a new song which was unlike anything I'd written before.
I bet that's what he wants us to think -.-  I'm on to you houndofbaskerville!
mmmm babies they taste so good....
I haven't been here too long, but this is definitely my favorite:  http://fr.reddit.com/r/science/comments/bj6do/antiintellectualism_is_to_me_one_of_the_most/  EDIT: I'm terrible with formatting still and failed at making "this is definitely my favorite" the link. Oh well. there it is. Also, I've now realized that link is the French reddit link. Except I"m not from france...fuck my life.
That's not that funny - just a pain in the ass.
I'm an opponent of the death penalty as well. However, there's clearly a difference between executing someone for murder and executing someone for fortune telling.  
Ed O'Bannon. I have his rookie card, and by now I think I owe money.
I went to [America's Best](http://www.twopair.com/) and got two pairs of eyeglasses for about $70 and the eye exam was included.  I didn't have a single problem with them at all.  
My previous masks were the 3drealms guys.
No, I think he is *a* bad president. But the bigger point is there is no "change" here. *He's carrying out the same foreign policy as his predecessor.*  People act as if it's odd to despise both Bush and Obama. In truth, it's odd to favor one and oppose the other because they have the same damn policies.
Scurvy's a bitch.
All signs point to no. 
"DAaaAAAaD! THAT was LAST WEEK! It was FOOORREEEVER ago"  /thingS_my_kid_said
no shit. its satirical, everyone knows that. but thats my point.
Heh...Lots of donuts...but stacks are harder to put in my hand
Yep. My GF is 23 and looks forward to it with the same giddy anticipation as my 5 yr old cousins.  Without a south park reference, can someone explain why we dye eggs?
Shit cannot hit the fan anymore.
My apologies, the setting is RenderAheadLimit=0. See if that does anything.
A year or two back I was buying a car and the guy who was filing out all the DMV and title paperwork at the car dealership with us just randomly blurted out that Children are like puppies and need constant attention until about 5.  He said after that it gets easier.
sphynx
I know, but it is quite a good webcomic.
Oh man, I can't stand when someone says they're "random."  That word needs to go away.
A grizzled chest cannot be bare.
Damn that is ugly, Atleast the other buildings in other olympic games meant something this is just a pile of shit wrecking a wonderfull city.
To address the "preaching to the choir" complaints:  yes, I am aware of that (and did also put this in r/politics), but putting it where like-minded people congregate increases it's chances of other people passing it on to those who may not be as acutely aware of the issue or understand how deeply it's effects run.  Also, no harm ever came from having a well-known, popular (stop laughing) celebrity lend his weight to the cause.
Annnnnnnnd now its back up.
What if all the employees then proceeded to stand up for him and quit simultaneously? If you've built a team that meshes well enough, this is a real risk.
I suppose "hard sciences" is a pretty vague term, but they enjoyed chemistry, math and other material covered in science and engineering courses. These two enjoyed chemistry and physics, so they ended up choosing Material Science as their degree. From my definition of hard sciences, I'd say that it's quite a large category. If you're versatile and enjoy a lot of things, I'd think that would make things easier on you if you *were* to go back to school and grab a different degree. The first year or so of most engineering/science/physics programs overlap quite a bit, and that is a great time to narrow down what you want to do. It's quite easy to bounce from physics to other disciplines if necessary, and you just might come across even more fields that you haven't yet considered. That's just a thought, though.
Wait, it wasn't Fox News. It was a blog post by a Fox news editor. Just like Dimocrats to slant the story. This is so hypocritical.
They are not abusing "byonce," they are abusing their ears.
^o^ (Shh, joke is for the muggles)  （知ってるww）
Cowboy Junkies covering Sweet Jane by The Velvet Underground
Just The Crust
Yup. I chew mine too... Then they sit in my teeth for a while and taste good.   Well, we finally learned how to lure out a Lurking Grue... Altoids. Remember that kids.
Uh... Leap year?
Yep.  I always thought the idea of *needing* money was scary.  Like, needing it to pay bills.  I liked the freedom I had when I was little.  More money meant extra candy and less money meant maybe I'd lose a pound (not that I cared about my weight when I was 6). 
Well, I don't think they'd have any problems with you haha. I've seen a few white people/families here and there, there were Asians too (I'm one of them). Maybe I could talk to some of the people I know there and have them recommend places where white people hang out, just to make it easier? :)
While we're at it, did/does anyone save those big circular cookies for last, so that you can efficiently scrape the remaining icing out of the chamber?
Bah, that's crazy talk.  Lee didn't even *have* a utility belt.
or rising "up", if we were to put it into a vertical sense.
If you look at his hand, you can see a ring of powder residue around the palm of his hand. Probably getting a little spark or two on him, but nothing horrid. 
&gt; Apartheid? No. Apartheid is a single state, Israel and Palestine are clearly two states.  [Likud Party Platform](http://www.knesset.gov.il/elections/knesset15/elikud_m.htm)  &gt; The Jewish communities in Judea, Samaria and Gaza are the realization of Zionist values. Settlement of the land is a clear expression of the unassailable right of the Jewish people to the Land of Israel and constitutes an important asset in the defense of the vital interests of the State of Israel. The Likud will continue to strengthen and develop these communities and will prevent their uprooting.  And don't you go around declaring that Palestine is a state, cause Israel 'gwan kick yo ass!  &gt; A unilateral Palestinian declaration of the establishment of a Palestinian state will constitute a fundamental and substantive violation of the agreements with the State of Israel and the scuttling of the Oslo and Wye accords. The government will adopt immediate stringent measures in the event of such a declaration.  &gt; Colonialist?   Yes.  They're creating colonies (settlements) in what you just said is another state.  &gt; Did they invade and declare that land as their own.  Yes.  See above.  Golan was formally annexed, even.  &gt; or did they take the ground now known as Palestine in an act of defence against Invasion?  Israel invaded.   Egypt was acting bellicose, but Rabin subsequently admitted they could not have invaded.   Moshe Dayan [said](http://www.nytimes.com/1997/05/11/world/general-s-words-shed-a-new-light-on-the-golan.html?pagewanted=all) that Israel grabbed the Golan for the farmland after creating deliberate provocations on Syrian front.  &gt; Racist? Maybe. Hell, probably.  Yup.   They could avoid having their loved ones killed by getting the fuck out of their colonialist land grab.  Even Ehud Barak admitted he'd be a militant if here were a Palestinian.
wow its grey! How can I get a grey (or darker) reddit?  Reddit's white background burns my retinas in low-light conditions.
My interest prior knowing this: 60-65%; after knowing: 0%.
yeah saint johns is much more exciting and its only like a 50 dollar sea plane between the two islands. If your not looking for anything too exciting i would see it as a great place to live, im actually thinking about retiring there later on in life!
They gain justification to continue the occupation and take further land. If there were no suicide bombers or attacks on Israel, Israel would have crumbled under the weight of international pressure and the exposure of the atrocities they have committed against the Palestinians. But because of the ability to provoke the Palestinians to violence, they can justify almost any act as self-defense. 
A lot of people on reddit downvote and upvote anything about Israel based on their view of Israel and it's not really about the article or the validity of anything said.
I agree with Foesi, a gas blow-back rifle will be as close as you can get to the real thing as a training device, without getting an m4 or ar15.  The problem with both the Inokatsu GBB, and the Systema is they are almost as expensive as the real rifle they replicate.  But they are both 1 to 1 replicas. If you need to sell the concept of an airsoft gun as a training device, try and get a GBB full metal pistol, and show your commander.  The internals of a Gas gun are remarkably similar to the real thing. Systema markets their airsoft guns as a PTW, or Personal Training Weapon.  While Inokastu just makes a point to make their guns as high quality as they can.  
So did she £ him?
Is it going to turn your iPhone into a taser?
Well, the big problem with your analogy is the 20 year time frame.  I'm an emacs guy, but after about two weeks of use I was way faster in my editor than people using VS or \*shudder\* the mouse. Since then, I've gotten even faster still. I'm pretty sure I'll keep picking up different tricks here and there until I retire.  Given the popularity of vi, I'd expect nothing less from it.  Sure, someone may have been able to be more productive than me in the first two weeks (or, heck, we'll even say month), but the time gained down the line is where it really makes sense.
Me too! and a book incinerator for when I'm done with the copy.... You know, akin to borrowing a book from the library and returning it.
was anyone else extremely startled when it came into the screen?
My point was that the bike didn't come with fairings stock.
I have a feeling I'll get downvoted for this, but I prefer my BB to an iphone or a droid. Mostly because I'm too damn clumsy to have a touch screen phone. That being said I'd LOVE a Reddit app.
The entire point they were trying to make is since motion controls are "hip" now, more and more games are trying to shoehorn them into their game when they don't even belong.  Think of how many core Wii titles have motion control aspects when it provides nothing to the game. I sure as hell didn't need Twilight Princess to force me to waggle the controller every time I wanted to swing my sword. Smash Bros. Brawl having you execute smash attacks by wiggling the wiimote actually detracted from the rest of the controls (thank god they let you disable it and use a gamecube controller). In Super Mario Galaxy shaking the controller to spin was beyond pointless. I could go on, but you see where I'm going; each of those games had the controls detracted because instead of a simple button press you now had an inaccurate carpel tunnel inducing waggle.  Now to try and cash in on the same cow that Nintendo has, Microsoft and Sony are coming out with motion controls that do very similar things. My concern is that the publishers (in an effort to make more money) will pressure developers to put in motion control in games where they don't belong and the overall quality of games will decline with a mandatory irrelevant motion control aspect.  Sure, there are some games where motion controls work, and having an excuse to get up every now and again is fine. I worry when the quality of a game suffers from motion controls, and then publishers push to make them even more prevalent in gaming.
tits or gtFo!
I said "two of the loves of my life". You know you are THE love of my life!
Awesome!  I never actually owned Tomba! (borrowed it from a friend), but I downloaded it a few years ago and played it again (I modded my ps2) and was happy to see that it's just as awesome.  How is Tomba 2?
Rachel Maddow has been outing these guys for every other sleazy right wing movement for quite a while now.
Awesome, I thought they had dissolved. 
I did.
mmmmmmhhmmmmm! Diabetes.
Going backwards timewise there would be a lot less people and they would be doing a lot less traveling.  Because of this there are probably plenty more places untouched by human feet than you'd normally think.  Just about any semi-remote area which hasn't previously been lush, full of needed materials or en route to such a place is certain to be full of them.
It'd be nice to have a look at the new layout. 
That would be one solution. Of course, the update is optional so long as you don't want or need to access the PSN. Perhaps they are more worried that the Other OS option is going to aid piracy. That would sort of make sense too since they are technically giving people the option to keep the feature by sacrificing online gaming and the PS Store. I'm willing to bet there is more behind this decision than we know.
Sanitarium and Longest Journey were really awesome, but Dreamfall is not a classic adventure and probably won't run on jactimetrics' laptop.
There don't seem to be options other than simply looking at it.  It appears that the frame is either lit from below or the photograph is upside down.
I suspect Lambo owners would look at high cost as being a plus.  "My clutch costs more than your car; I keep burning it out transporting all that pussy, cash, and cocaine."
The hate is fully comprehensible in her case though..  I mean, she's probably feared for her life multiple times from Israeli soldiers and had family and friends die because of the conflict.  And then there's the blockade of needed goods for economic activity and any poverty she saw could be directly linked to Israelis.  Her whole life she has effectively been persecuted by Isreali Jews.  I imagine it's very hard to not grow up with fiery hate.  And most humans feel emotions first, then find the rationalizations for them.  The word 'sometimes' should clue you in that she doesn't always think like this.  If pressed, she would probably say that what Hitler was a terrible person and Jews shouldn't be put in ovens (but maybe only the Israelis).  But, I don't know her.  
Just reverse the polarity!
Exactly, I had the same problem, just fixing your posture could probably help. Also, working out wouldn't hurt if you don't already. I found that since I go to the gym on a regular basis, most of these kind of problems are gone.  *Though, see a doctor about that wrist before any kind of workout! A tendonitis is easy to treat.
If you're a steam user, this will also artificially inflate your 'hours played' score. My steam account says I've played 130 hours of BC2, I've logged maybe 40 of actual gametime. :-/
You have no friends on your Hulu account.  Your email address is tonuchifrungo@gmail.com.  Here's your blog = http://sewersoc.blogspot.com/  You got $10,000 to go to Knox college.  Do you have a friend named Kamieka Shawnta who dislikes it when you call her taco burner? http://74.125.95.132/search?q=cache:b7hJAgGpqlAJ:69.63.181.11/notes.php%3Fid%3D746332782+%22kamieka+shawnta%22+daniel+mauleon&amp;cd=1&amp;hl=en&amp;ct=clnk&amp;gl=us&amp;client=firefox-a
It's funny.  What am I supposed to do?  Cave to the denim-suede  secret police?  Nah.
It's not the size that matters. It's what you do with it.
a pack of cigarettes
Hahaha, personal preferences? Have you ever actually read some of the regulations? Because lawyers like to stretch the wording of laws to the breaking point they tend to be stupidly specific and detailed. And yeah, a lot of the time situations require thought and can differ from case to case. That's why we have *judges* - when charged with breaking a regulation companies are free to appeal the decision, they do it all the time. It's also precisely why we will always need regulators - as things change regulations will have to change as well.
If anyone here goes, make sure to remind everyone at the protest that these people are extremely sue-happy and they do this for a living. Be careful.
Downvoting someone's personal experience?  Impressive.
That is the plot of [Just Friends](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Just_Friends)
my friend and i were playing video games after a party in my room. both of us were drunk but my room mate was way beyond and passed out on his bed. anyway he gets up whips it out and pees all over my friend and then goes back to bed.
Let's not forget that it cut fine, the first time he tried.
&gt; Your playing may sound better to you when you're high  But for composing, that alone is very helpful.
Akh! That's blasphemy.
Shakespeare or Moliere?
FUCK YES.
&gt;I dont remember the cold war, but I grew up before 9/11  Yeah, we almost had to disassemble pieces of our army. Good thing 9-11 changed that!
Jesus was male because at the time only a male could be accepted as a religious figure.  God does not have a gender.
I agree with all your additional casualties. If the writers keep Jin and Sun together, there's no problem knocking Desmond off. I'll bet that he and Widmore come to some reconciliation first, though.  I hope Ben lives. He hasn't had much of a life so far. What about Alpert? Does he get off the island?  I like Jack better this season, but I wouldn't go as far as luv.  I've seen The English Patient a number of times. de Almásy and Katharine immolated by the intensity of their passion is an appealing metaphor. And it's Ralph, but pronounced Rafe - why? I do not know. Naveen Andrews as Kip is *mmmm*.
Can you give an example of a situation where you think this would be the best solution?
We are a small company and do everything the grassroots way so you'll never see us shelling out Absolut and Jack money.   I also like Stoli - I 'think' they are one of the few big vodkas left who still properly distill their vodka rather than go through a 'distillation process'.  I wouldn't place our vodka in the same category as Stoli. We are a Sweet Tea Vodka - and we were the first. Our category is one of the fastest growing in the market and the big boys are trying to buy their way onto the shelves etc. However, Firefly is better.  We use pure tea, pure sweetener, pure vodka, pure water. We are made with real tea from the only tea plantation in the United States and we are made with Louisiana Cane sugar. 
Yeah, these people gotta wait until shes 18 to rape her.
A figurative slap in the face in the West is better than literal acid to the face in Muslim countries. 
So my wish to have a completely toned upper body with legs I can use as a bean bag chair was for naught? Damn it!
keep it up! we need more browsers!
I agree.... why did this young boy have access to a shot gun.  I really believe that this kid should pay for what he did.  He took two lives, and took away the mom of a four year old.  I think severe psychiatric help is necessary and I do think he should be tried as an adult.  If tried as a juvenile, the courts can only keep him until he is 21, and they he is back on the streets.  I think another question we should be asking ourselves is why did this kid have the gun?  The story doesn't say it, but the gun was given to him as a gift by his father, which is illegal. The state of Pennsylvania has up to 5 years to bring charges against him; it will be interesting to see if they follow up on that
Too lazy.  The link I posted was the first one google gave me.
y++ is always executed, no?  EDIT:  Maybe you want this:    if(x == -1)  {    counts[y] = str;    y++;  }  The brackets are good for readability, so you don't forget which code is part of the if block, and which one is outside of it's "reach". 
I can't believe you aren't upvoted more!  You also should mention vampires and werewolves.
It's sarcasm--it's implying the girl thinks you're some sort of creep or something less than human living in a hole.
How do I do that?
Look at what [Cato](http://world.std.com/~mhuben/cato.html) is doing, not what they call themselves.
Oddly, Mosaic 2.7 (which is _17 years old_) works better than IE5.2: http://i.imgur.com/viKHQ.png  (Forgive the hideous Lucid Lynx window decoration; I've been testing it in a VM...)
I love it when people automatically dismiss MMOs just because they are MMOs. Do you really think that there is nothing worth playing there? Sorry but you are missing out on some great games.
For the first time I can see real beauty in the Bible.  That's a nice looking graph.
**Calm down**, just **calm down**.
You are thinking of Star Wars Galaxies.  Blizzard was owned by Vivendi which merged with Activision.  That is how they got folded into Activision.  I don't know why this was allowed, Blizzard has always operated independently and made assloads of money for Vivendi.
My friend is the same way. I can't understand how she doesn't smoke there!
It reminds me of that dream I had where I was raped by John Tesh.
with [GOATFACTORY!](http://urd.yahoo.co.jp/geo/top/e-list2/SIG=11cnsk9bk/*http%3A//www.geocities.jp/goatfactory1192/)
Some great info man! I'm upvoting you for putting this all together for our fellow ents. 
What an enterprising young entrepreneur. 
Don't think so. I'm listening to music vids right now.
[ post ] (links)
*increasedly bader
I prefer 'Friar'.
Kefka is the best FF character ever. "I hate...hate hate...hate hate hate...hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate hate you!"
Damn, why couldn't you have posted this 2 weeks ago before I started my "summer abs" diet??? 
you bastard.. you got my hopes up so much... and then.. and then.. *sobs and runs off* 
For everyone in this thread telling their inspiring stories: as a point of reference, how old are each of you?
I've been told by several people that I should have been born in the 1800s because the process of courting would have suited me. It weirded me out.   
NERD FIGHT!
https://www.dropbox.com/referrals/NTU3NzI5NzY5
Cheers to you too, fella.
Missing the meat and two veg.
They get to "legitimately" deploy their army into the occupied territories in "response" to the attacks. And gradually over time, [they take control](http://www.nad-plo.org/maps/borders/jpeg/two%20state%20solution%20map.jpg). 
That's true. I guess I'm just assuming it's a diamond ring and not a ring made from mallomar. Forgive me. I can be so narrow minded sometimes.
These same people flooded the Republican-led Congress with phone calls to stop Comprehensive Immigration Reform.  Don't think that they are wedded to every idea that the Republican leadership gets behind.
Make sure you upload the song on the website and thank you! 
SR Iron!  Why you say?? [Look here!](http://www.srware.net/en/software_srware_iron_chrome_vs_iron.php)  Chrome without the google!  *edit:link was to German page*
Try Oxiclean for data spills.
Nostalgia just isn't what it used to be
This isn't actually my auction, although the seller is located within 100km of me. I just happened to be ebaying for sharpeners (seriously, sharpeners) and found this.
Along with few already mentioned here: * Return to Castle Wolfenstein Multiplayer (and Singleplayer)  * American McGee's Alice  * Severance: Blade of Darkness  * Anachronox  * The Lost Vikings  * Golden Axe
Anyone in Asia able to do this? If not my friend and I can join a HoN or DoTA team in the US, we normally play 1650+ games with 300ish ping regularly.
When we achieve the medical advancement needed to support a zygote won't abortion be a non issue. We could develop an entire industry where unwanted pregnancies are transfered to a facility where the fetus is grown and made available for a fee based adoption.  
Thats what CiV IV looks like?  Damn was i wrong.  What i thought it looked like crap now since i saw a screenshot i now know it looks good.
So say we all?
There is one issue with this: Xbox Originals.  Microsoft sells Xbox 1 games on Live, and if its an online-focused game (i.e.: Crimson Skies, Conker), then you're selling a game that will be substantially limited right off the bat.  Crimson Skies is on the Originals list, as is Chaos Theory.  Chaos Theory is a full game, but Crimson Skies was definitely online-focused.
I don't get offended. To actually hear me talk... When I am online it's easy to believe something I have said is me taking offense, but typically I am A) trying to understand what someone is saying or B) using what they just said to help make a point. It takes a lot to make me angry. Like... No one has been able to make me properly offended in years. It just doesn't happen.
Some of my favorites. Some of which have been mentioned already.. oh well. Honestly I've probably played Tomba! and Tomba 2 ten times each. And whenever I need an RPG to play, when I have nothing new to play, I always end up going back to Legend of Legaia for some reason. That game is just so awesome.   * Bushido Blade 1 &amp; 2  * Megaman Legends 1 &amp; 2  * Ehrgeiz  * Legend of Legaia  * Tomba 1 &amp; 2  * RAD  * Gitaroo-man  * Zone of the Enders 1 &amp; 2  * Threads of Fate
There is a fair amount of [homebrew](http://www.touchzune.com/forums/showthread.php?s=bddee938461b3e423afa9eef788f0a3d&amp;t=278), but to be honest, the Zune's future looks rather [bleak](http://news.softpedia.com/news/XNA-Game-Studio-4-0-Not-for-Zune-HD-Just-Windows-Xbox-360-and-Windows-Phone-7-136999.shtml). (Although, at the same time, Microsoft has announced a 64 GB Zune HD. Are they really expanding on a dead-end product?) It really is a shame because the Tegra processor is pretty powerful, and only a couple of the games actually take advantage of it. 
Right now my 7-year old daughter is watching Fairy Odd Parents. I can't even imagine what was going through this poor girls mind when she was being raped.
If you're going to use quotes, my favorite bible blooper is Deuteronomy 25:11-12. If two men are fighting, and the wife of one of them intervenes by grabbing the other guy's balls, you cut her hand off.
In college, when I was hitchhiking a lot,  I knew that the worst place to be on a late Sunday morning when church was letting out was anywhere near that church.
and make sure you upload the song on the website! 
Lamepressive
Funny, that's what I did...and, I get what I linked to when I click it.  ???
If it's in your chest, you're doing it wrong. 
Import it man. I'm In New Zealand and got a USA import via MightyApe.co.nz. Works perfectly.
No.
As long as the G is in there somewhere, that's all that matters.   EDIT: I see what you did, looks good.
Yes, yes it does, and string theory *does* assert that the universe is made of things that we can't prove exist. The thing is that both of these are much more complicated than that, and hold implications in our fields that are much more significant than these generalizations suggest.  I'm not here to break balls, I'm sorry if my previous comment came across as abrasive.
Burial, bassnectar, also even though they aren't dubstep, checkout sts9, heavy bass electronic band
My best friend from high school goes there!
If you like Flatland but wonder whether a more realistic two-dimensional universe could support a civilization, you might like [The Planiverse](http://www.amazon.com/gp/product/0387989161?ie=UTF8&amp;tag=therpen-20&amp;linkCode=as2&amp;camp=1789&amp;creative=390957&amp;creativeASIN=0387989161) by A.K. Dewdney.  It's one of my favorite books, and it pays much attention to detail, including the biology, technology, culture, and physics that would allow a two-dimensional universe to work the way ours does.  It's a thought experiment taken to its extremes.
Who's the guy in drag?   also, Bill Murray was at this same party, but the photographer chose not to capture him, since no one would ever believe him anyway.
That explains those bumper stickers that read "Jesus is my co-pilot"
Did you forget that the clouds and bushes are from the same sprites? shucks i don't care you're cute
yes it is!!!
Wanna Be Your Dog by The Stooges
&gt;It's hard to find a mechanic to work on a 30 year old bike.  Really? I've never heard of people having that problem.
This is getting a bit annoying to try to explain this. The probability of almost everything !=0 and !=100. There might be a 1 in 100,000 (or some other high number) chance of getting raped in church in front of your mom. (Or maybe it's 1 because you live in Rwanda or something). The point is, while it's really close to 0 for practical purposes, it's never *actually* 0.  That said, most people understand that that probability means it is highly improbable for such a scenario to happen, and therefore it does not affect their behavior.  What matters is not whether a situation is *absolutely* safe-- it never is. The question is whether it is safe *enough*, and this  &gt;That is to say, still not 100% safe. But the odds are pretty good.  was referring to a situation where you are definitely safe *enough*. Now can we cut out the crap about how 'if you don't feel 100% safe in a [very safe situation], you must be paranoid'?
Yes. I basically am in that situation.
Random advice from a some dude you've never met and have no reason to listen to: start at "The rain let up." Delete everything above.  That's chapter one.
proceed.  
i am a tester. the author of the blog asked me to make this post for her because there were technical issues.
It'd be nice to be able to turn on the tube to something as great as the attenborough version of "Life".  When they rerun it we'll still be getting the shit version.
Does [N-blox](http://www.freetetris.org/) count?
Oscar Wilde
Hear laggy and lacky here (near Middlesbrough), both more often than elastic.
Could you imagine "finding common ground" with me if I said I wanted freedom and my definition of freedom was the ability to kill anyone I wanted at any time? Just because I *claim* to love freedom doesn't mean I actually believe in the right values.
Yes she did admit to a sheriff's deputy that she hit me.  Out of anger.
It involves teleportation to another realm. Preferably one with lots of open space.
Whats interesting is how much higher premiums are on physical rather than they used to be as a percentage of the total.  Back in 2002 or so you used to be able to find premiums of $10 on $300 gold (3.3% premiums) on physical.  Now you regularly find $50 premiums on $1100 gold (4.5% premiums) physical.   Yet, through all this time, its still possible to buy paper-gold at spot (or below in many cases). Now, how would it be possible that the COMEX is able to continue to sell at spot, when their supposed physical inventory has such big premiums attached?   Its obvious that something is "not right" with the market. Look for the great disconnect to happen eventually. At some point, the "spot price" will *have* to stop being the London/NY paper market and become the real physical market. Its becoming increasingly clear that those "paper markets" are fantasies....a magical place where you can buy gold at 5% under the "real world".
[I know, right?](http://i.imgur.com/ZgaS2.png)
lol thats so wrong... they made her look fucking scary in the last south park episode, i stopped watching the episode cause her face was creeping me out so much.
Should you buy it? Do you have $27,500 laying around and anything at all you could do with it?
Heading to Oberlin next year
so the difference between 3  and 1 is he doesn't poop his pants and he says funny things.  How does this help in bringing his life back?
Have you ever heard of the StyleLife Challenge? Neil Strauss wrote it. It's amazing. You should look into it.  Edit: It's number four on DiggCalled's list!
In September 2008, I was late for class, waiting for an opening into the most popular parking lot on campus, and a line had formed out in traffic (which would get people fined, but they really wanted parking spots). There was some confusion between me and this really old guy with an awesome hat -- because of the way the line was forming, I was basically forced to cut him off. He looked really upset, and I felt horrible, so when we'd both gotten in and parked our cars, I went over and desperately apologized to him.  He just got the biggest smile and said, "Beautiful, you ain't gotta worry about a thing." Then he just straight up pulled me into him and kissed me on the forehead. He then said "And anyway, anyone who likes Obama is good people." (he'd seen my bumper sticker)  I was grinning like an idiot all the way to class. It was just too adorable.
Weird.. I can post "The most awesome video ever" but when I try and post "The most retarded shit ever" it gives me an error of "Error, Try again"
Look into firebug (firefox extension), it makes going through the source on pages MUCH easier, so you can quickly find snippets like this:   .moderator.author:before {   color: #FF0011;   content: "Saydrah";   font-size: 10px;   font-weight: bold;   margin-right: -3px;   visibility: visible;  }
**10-4**
Desmond hadn't meet Faraday in 1996 until after his flashes started.  Regardless of the requirement that the constant be someone who really matters to you, Faraday couldn't have helped unite Desmond's temporal history if he wasn't even a piece of it until after that history started unwinding.
I would not interfere, either, because he was bigger and stronger than she was, so I'd figure he could handle her if he had to.  If I did anything, it would be to tell him to "man up and don't take that shit from her, walk away and never see her again."  The fucked up thing is that if he did hit her in self defense, he'd be going to jail.  That's the fucked up part.
Huh? No.   If you own an establishment you have the right to ask disruptive people to leave. There's no law stating that you must have an official policy to cover each and every possible offensive behaviour.
Wow... this is gonna wreck my eve career.
I call strawman.  The statement that "God is pure energy" is attributed to the imaginary scholastic?  The word energy has a physical, not a theological or philosophical meaning.
It does not seem to be easy to create an independent supportive group of the current government a la the Tea Party for the reason that it is said to be easier to destruct than to construct.   A supporting independent group would not be able to collectively agree with everything that the government has been doing and would have to have answers to all kinds of issues and would have a moving target on what the government has had to do and what the opposition has been throwing around... sh-t in the fan.  What does the Tea Party stand for? Primarily Tea Party members want a better economy and more jobs, but they also want all kinds of other things that may or may not have special interests behind them. Some may contradict each other and some may be impossible to implement without starting the country over.  My idea for starting the country over is to try to split it into hundreds of smaller countries or something... This way each small country could better tend to the people in it and people could know each other and trust each other and better prioritize policies... This would also make people more reliant on people from other "countries" so there was a greater sense of working with people from different cultures and stuff... :-)  Europe is a template for that, but Europe has got some big countries that could be split into smaller ones for instance. :-)  This way, the would could have tens of thousands of countries each could cultivate different cultures and some could teach God's words in schools and others could stick to evolution/Darwinism and no country would be too big to fail. :-)
&gt; cannot be expected to have total control over what their users do with the system.  why not. since sony does have control over your system over updates it's not far fetched for nvidia to expect it. 
Yeah except nowadays you don't usually get beat to death for being weird. 
How many billions? is likely to be hidden in Switzerlands banks to escape U.S. taxes?
I am in NY now but will be in KY at the time. I'm going to vote obviously but am not under any illusions that it's gonna translate to reality =p. I agree though and have been telling any person i come across to make sure they are registered. 
mmm thats nice
Why are they mutually exclusive?  I wear tampons with pantyliners all the time.  Because sometimes, I have heavy flows when I don't expect it, and if I'm at work I don't want to ever have the situation where my underwear starts feeling moist because my tampon is now full. It's like using a condom while on birth control (assuming you are not at risk for STDs)--you don't *need* it, but it makes you feel safer.  (Yes, I know birth control is not 100%--neither is my pantyliner)
This is very true.  I think all men have a little doubt the first few years, because it's mainly the mother that interacts and we get stuck with the dirty diapers.   One big thing though is that moms have a tendency to make the child their #1, and this can be very bad (especially if you are feeling a little leery of being a father anyway).  Make sure that you both keep the priorities straight.  Also, this usually changes once Dad becomes the focus later on (3-4 years old and up).   One bit of advice, don't have more until you are sure it's right for you.  :)
I tricked NPR into saying Mike Rotch in one of their reports. I didn't think they'd fall for it, but my cousin who lives 300 miles away called me and said that he had definitely heard me on the radio.
Well, I'm gunna avoid going completely cliche on this, but it is true that you have no chance with an attractive girl *if* that's your approach to approaching them. Why would a pretty girl you don't talk to have the ability to hurt you? You haven't gotten maced before, have you?  Hit on the girl in the library if she's the one you find attractive. Not because you expect her to be easy. You look at her that way and I assure you she won't be anyways.  Attitude is everything.
Thanks for the AMA. Can you tell us more specifically what are of physics you are working on? Maybe something on the level of an abstract. I'd like to ask some questions, but so far I can't tell exactly what your area is.
http://imgur.com/SFK9n.jpg
&gt; Remember when it was just an RPG series?  No.  FF has always been the epitome of JRPG.
Wow he called it manabar? What a hypocrite.
What do you mean what's wrong? Top 3 in almost every statistical category ever. Very disappointing.
Most likely due to his heavy cocaine use over the years, at least that's just this narrator's humble opinion. 
That random guy is running public interference for an insurrectionist movement which is using political violence to change outcomes determined by constitutionally elected representatives.
Plus the bacon almost melts in your mouth for an explosion of flavor. Perfect crispy bacon every time.
It's changing, even though losing the war of northern aggression is still a sore point, I can happily report that after openly admitting I can read AND write, the number of burning crosses in my backyard have not increased signif..ehh..too much.
Yeah the T is really just a place holder until they legalize something worse anyway.
True.
"my computer
The latter is/would be a simple business decision to avoid liability. It is one of the most basic of business moves, really, to not get sued.
Oh nah, that was a while ago. I've found my way and have my own style. I was just saying how some things work for some people and some for others. You really just have to find your way, and unfortunately, it's a lot easier for some people to begin with.
A side note on this quote: I was driving back from Lake Havasu where me and a bunch of friends went for spring break. I cop pulled me over for speeding and made me step out of the car. Apparently I was acting shifty to him, because he kept asking me why I was nervous (I've never gotten pulled over before, that's why!). Keep in mind that I was stone sober at the time, had nothing in my car that was illegal, and we were standing on blacktop in the middle of the AZ desert. That's when he asked me,"do you mind if I look around your car?"  This song was popular at the time, and was really the only reason I knew that I could say no. He told me to have a nice day and that was it.  TL;DR: This lyric saved me from an unnecessary police search.
&gt;primarily for a Japanese audience.  Are you sure about that? I always thought Final Fantasy games did much better overseas than in Japan, where the traditional gameplay of Dragon Quest is king.
Metal Gear Solid 4, hands down. It plays with with razor-sharp precision, has phenomenal graphics, amazing replay value and highly polished production values overall. Awesome, awesome game.
Yes - and no. But the wife is.
Toto, we're not in Atheist subreddit anymore.
HA! yea right, if you were a stalker you would know that  dont have window, as my bedroom is in the basement.... LOSER!   (even if it is you yunus)
...or the processor. I remember taking a PC apart to figure out why it would randomly shut down and it turned out to be that the heat sink for the CPU was completely clogged up with cat hair and the cpu would overheat. Cleaned that out and no more problems.  But seriously, if you aren't a computer hack, get someone else to deal with it for you. Either take it to a shop or find a geek friend who can troubleshoot. Keep in mind that anyone who is any good at this sort of thing is probably harassed by a million people so make sure you pay them back in some way - beer/pizza, wine/cheese, or some fine herb should do the trick.
The best JRPG of all time works better in an emulator than on the PSX now.  Suikoden II
&gt;The new guy will do more work for less money because he has been desperately looking for a job and is essentially ready to give blowjobs for his paycheck.  FTFY
Yes, thats the exception, generally when a boy meets a girl they fuse like a tree growing around a bicycle :P
I always think its amazing how malleable our memory is. We always try to shove our memories into our current view of the world. Same principle that leading questions are based off of - its easy to get people to believe something if it fits into how they think they should remember it.
I got a creative writing degree, and that's all the reward I needed. That and a degree that was actually worth something.
Like almost all games and toys, what makes Lego childish is that it signals a self-centred fascination with idle amusements.  I admit I have my Nintendo DS in my lap as I write this.  Yet I play down the amount of games I really have played over the years to others.  Because I don't want them to know I've frittered away weeks if not months of my life playing RPGs, RTS and FPS when I could've been doing something with other human beings.  It is selfish.  That's why it's childish.  Because children are selfish and adults are supposed to understand that.
awesome, now you don't have to hold your pants up while running to class. 
Fifth'd (on a side note have any of you taken the http://www.faceblind.org test and if so did you score high?)
&gt; If by object-extentions you mean things Objective-C and C++  No, these are languages. There are object-extensions that can be used with a plain C compiler.  &gt; pretty much all Mac OS X applications ... in Objective C  Which is not true. All the FreeBSD and Mach stuff is not written in Objective-C. Many software just uses an adapter to Objective-C, but runs much of their stuff in their own language or in just plain C. I just got a new version of EyeTV and I'm pretty sure that their new 64bit MPEG2 decoder is not written in Objective-C. For much stuff just the UI parts are written in Objective C.  &gt; Object-based programming (cleanly combine class-based and prototype-based programming – best of both worlds with none of the bad parts) Predicate dispatching Pattern dispatching Mirror-based reflection (capability-based security with reflection) Per-object mixins The Agora programming language (the only language to really get encapsulation right – "The Scheme of Object-oriented Programming") Nested mixin-methods (the perfect way to handle inheritance in my opinion) Lexical inheritance Computed object-literals (eschew lambda and closures for something more general) Objects without global scope as first-class parametric modules (making ML modules look shoddy and dated) Subjective-programming (utilising context-sensitive behaviour) Seamlessly distributed object-oriented languages like Obliq Pattern-matching which respects encapsulation Specialisation interfaces (the possibility of optional type-inference for most any object-oriented language, even the dynamic ones). The integration of Actors and Objects, so programmers can easily write programs in ad-hoc network environments. ...  Wait, wait. Weren't we talking about mind-blowing recent stuff?  Agora and Obliq have been abandoned more than a decade ago, haven't they?. I have never seen any useful software written in it. Stuff like Predicate Dispatch is also more than a decade old and I'm pretty sure it existed before that somewhere in the Prolog community.  Is there anything really exciting new in the OO world that is of practical use? Used by somebody?  CLOS was developed with the MOP from the start. It's just that the MOP part hasn't been standardized by ANSI. The MOP part is the ground breaking part. At least Alan Kay thought that the AMOP book was important, though unfortunately for him, using Lisp.
nope, didn't have the money nor dedication to get a scale. i've read it is very different compared to DMT. no visuals, etc. however, it's something i'm interested in trying but i don't plan on needing a scale very much in the future so it wouldn't be a smart investment.
